The Great Seal of the U.S.
ELECTRONIC ADVANCE DOCUMENTS
International Relations 
Art, Literature 
2002
Oct
Nov
Dec
2003
Jan
Feb
Mar
Apr
May
Jun
Jul
Aug
Sep
Oct
Nov
Dec
Current Issue Article Alert Home
[See more of our sites..]
[BUTTON Input] (not implemented)____
November 2003 AD3247 -- Pfleeger, Charles P.; Schneier, Bruce; Quarterman, John S.; Metzger, Perry; Bace, Rebecca; Gutmann, Peter.
CYBERINSECURITY: THE COST OF MONOPOLY.
HOW THE DOMINANCE OF MICROSOFT'S PRODUCTS POSES A RISK TO SECURITY (Computer 
The authors note that computing is crucial to the infrastructure of advanced countries.
They assert that, as fast as the world's computing infrastructure is growing, security vulnerabilities within it are growing faster still.
The security situation is deteriorating, and that deterioration compounds when nearly all computers in the hands of end users rely on a single operating system subject to the same vulnerabilities the world over.
AD3248 -- FOREIGN ASSISTANCE: STRATEGIC WORKFORCE PLANNING CAN HELP USAID ADDRESS CURRENT AND FUTURE CHALLENGES (United States General Accounting Office, September 23, 2003, 37 pages)
USAID has evolved from an agency in which U.S. direct-hire staff directly implemented development projects to one in which U.S. direct-hire staff oversee the activities of contractors and grantees.
Since 1992, the number of USAID U.S. direct-hire staff declined by 37 percent, but the number of countries with USAID programs almost doubled and, over the last 2 years, program funding increased more than 50 percent.
As a result of these and other changes in its workforce and its mostly ad-hoc approach to workforce planning, USAID faces several human capital vulnerabilities.
For example, attrition of experienced foreign service officers and inadequate training and mentoring have sometimes led to the deployment of staff who lack essential skills and experience.
The agency also lacks a "surge capacity" to respond to evolving foreign policy priorities and emerging crises.
With fewer and less experienced staff managing more programs in more countries, USAID's ability to oversee the delivery of foreign assistance is becoming increasingly difficult.
AD3249 -- CAMPAIGN 2004: FOREIGN POLICY IN THE PRESIDENTIAL ELECTION (Council on Foreign Relations (CFR), Updated September 28, 2003, Various pagings)
This site by CFR provides a valuable compilation of foreign policy views of the major candidates to date in the 2004 presidential election - (Incumbent) Republican George W. Bush and Democrats Wesley Clark, Howard Dean, John Edwards, Richard Gephardt, Bob Graham, John Kerry, Dennis Kucinich, Joseph Lieberman, Carol Moseley Braun, and Al Sharpton.
It also includes basic biographical data on each candidate and the full text of major foreign policy statements, both official releases as well as transcripts of interviews from such sources as "Meet the Press".
Transcripts of the Democratic Presidential Candidate Debates of May 3, 2003 and September 4, 2003 are also available online at this website.
There are also links to each candidate's campaign web page for further information.
AD3250 -- DeNavas-Walt, Carmen; Cleveland, Robert W.; Webster, Bruce H., Jr.
INCOME IN THE UNITED STATES: 2002 (United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census, September 26, 2003, 35 pages)
Median money income for all U.S. households fell 1.1 percent between 2001 and 2002 to $42,400.
These estimates reflect the effect of the recession that began in March 2001 and ended in November 2001.
Real median household money income has declined 3.4 percent between 1999 and 2002, statistically the same as the decline in money income in a comparable period (1989 to 1992) covering the July 1990-March 1991 recession.
Overall, real median household money income is up 30.1 percent since 1967, the first year median household money income was computed.
AD3251 -- U.N. PEACEKEEPING: TRANSITION STRATEGIES FOR POST-CONFLICT COUNTRIES LACK RESULTS-ORIENTED MEASURES OF PROGRESS (United States General Accounting Office (GAO), Web-posted September 26, 2003, 64 pages)
Congress asked GAO to assess the U.N. strategy for peacekeeping transitions in countries with complex emergencies.
In this report, GAO (1) identifies the elements of the U.N. transition strategy; (2) assesses the extent to which the United Nations is attempting to apply the strategy in Sierra Leone, East Timor, and the Democratic Republic of the Congo; and (3) assesses the challenges to implementing the strategy in these countries.
AD3252 -- 2003 REPORT TO CONGRESS ON COMBATING TERRORISM (Executive Office of the President, Office of Management and Budget, September 22, 2003, 77 pages)
Consistent with the requirements of Fiscal Year 1998 National Defense Authorization Act, the fifth annual Report to Congress on Combating Terrorism (hereafter referred to as the "Report") details government-wide spending to combat terrorism.
As the Report demonstrates, the Federal government has taken decisive action since September 11, 2001 to protect the nation and combat terrorism overseas.
In compliance with the Homeland Security Act of 2002, future Reports will be transmitted with the President's Budget.
The report discusses the Department of Homeland Security's progress and some of its challenges in fulfilling its critical and far-reaching mission.
AD3253 -- Peterson, Peter G.; Bloomgarden, Kathy; Grunwald, Henry; Morey, David E.; Telhami, Shibley; Sieg, Jennifer; Herbstman, Sharon.
FINDING AMERICA'S VOICE: A STRATEGY FOR REINVIGORATING U.S. PUBLIC DIPLOMACY.
(Council on Foreign Relations (CFR), September 18, 2003, 100 pages)
The members of the Task Force make a compelling case that hatred and ill will toward the United States and its policies are dangerous and growing, and that radical changes are needed in response.
The Task Force recommends the immediate integration of public diplomacy into the foreign policymaking process rather than just trying to explain policies after the fact--present at the "take-offs, not just the crash landings."
Failure to take this and other steps will make it more difficult for the United States to maintain the war against terror and other policy undertakings, the Task Force concludes.
AD3254 -- U.S.
GOVERNMENT MANUAL, 2003-2004 EDITION (United States National Archives and Records Service, Government Printing Office (GPO), Web-posted September 12, 2003, Various pagings)
As the official handbook of the Federal Government, the United States Government Manual provides comprehensive information on the agencies of the legislative, judicial, and executive branches.
It also includes information on quasi-official agencies, international organizations in which the United States participates, and boards, commissions, and committees.
The Manual begins with reprints of the Declaration of Independence and the U.S. Constitution.
AD3255 -- Davey, Michael E. FEDERAL RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT FUNDING: FY2004 (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, Updated September 29, 2003, 19 pages)
President Bush has proposed to increase R
The Department of Defense (DOD} would receive the largest proposed increase, climbing to a proposed record high of $61.8 billion.
Based on the 11 appropriations bills passed by the House, CRS estimates that Federal R
AD3256 -- Noland, Marcus.
RELIGION, CULTURE, AND ECONOMIC PERFORMANCE (Institute for International Economics (IIE), September 2003, 63 pages)
This paper is an attempt to empirically analyze the idea that intermediating institutions may be the mechanism through which religious belief affects economic performance at the aggregate level.
The paper first reviews the line of reasoning initiated by Weber that the specific content of religious beliefs may profoundly affect economic behavior.
It then examines efforts undertaken primarily by psychologists and sociologists to quantitatively score national cultural tendencies.
In the fourth section, data on religious affiliation, national culture, and economic performance are analyzed at the cross-national level.
Since considerable recent commentary has focused on the alleged impact of Islam, specifically on economic performance, this issue is addressed in the fifth section, both cross-nationally and at the sub-national level, using data from three multi-religious, multi-ethnic countries?India, Malaysia, and Ghana?located in three different areas of the world.
AD3257 -- ASSESSMENT OF U.S. ACTIVITIES TO COMBAT TRAFFICKING IN PERSONS (U.S. Department of Justice, August 2003, 25 pages)
According to a 2003 U.S. Government estimate, 800,000 to 900,000 people are trafficked across international borders each year having been bought, sold, transported and held in slavery-like conditions for sex and labor exploitation.
The U.S. Government estimates that 18,000 to 20,000 people are trafficked annually into the United States.
This assessment reviews U.S. legislative and executive branch government activities to improve U.S. protections for and assistance to victims trafficked into the United States, to increase successful investigations and prosecutions of traffickers, and to augment international activities to combat trafficking.
AD3258 -- HEALTH, UNITED STATES, 2003 (United States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, National Center for Health Statistics, Web-posted October 3, 2003, 471 pages)
Health, United States, 2003 is a comprehensive report with the latest statistics from Federal health agencies, the U.S. Census Bureau, population surveys, and other data.
The report was prepared by the National Center for Health Statistics (NCHS) in HHS' Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and is the 27th annual report to the President and Congress, as required by The Public Health Service Act.
AD3259 -- HUMAN CAPITAL: INSIGHTS FOR U.S. AGENCIES FROM OTHER COUNTRIES' SUCCESSION PLANNING AND MANAGEMENT INITIATIVES (United States General Accounting Office, Web-posted October 1, 2003, 30 pages)
Leading public organizations engage in broad, integrated succession planning and management efforts that focus on strengthening both current and future organizational capacity.
As part of this approach, these organizations identify, develop, and select their human capital to ensure that successors are the right people, with the right skills, at the right time for leadership and other key positions
AD3260 -- Frey, William H. METROPOLITAN MAGNETS FOR INTERNATIONAL AND DOMESTIC MIGRANTS (Brookings Institution, October 2003, 23 pages)
An analysis of the flow of domestic and international migrants into and out of the nation's 81 most populous metropolitan areas between 1995 and 2000.
AD3261 -- Steinberg, James B.; Graham, Mary; Eggers, Andrew.
BUILDING INTELLIGENCE TO FIGHT TERRORISM (Brookings Institution, September 2003, 8 printed pages)
The president's homeland security plan calls for new intelligence efforts to protect the nation's borders, defend against threats within the United States, minimize infrastructure vulnerabilities, and improve emergency responses.
In this Brookings Policy Brief, the authors examine what policymakers must consider to support transformed national security needs.
AD3262 -- BIOTECHNOLOGY RESEARCH IN AN AGE OF TERRORISM: CONFRONTING THE DUAL USE DILEMMA (National Academy Press, October 8, 2003, 122 pages)
The report recommends that the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services create an independent National Science Advisory Board for Biodefense to advise on the risks and benefits of new technology such as genetic engineering.
The report, written by a committee of scientists, legal experts and ethicists, notes that the traditional way scientists share information -- in openly published journals, at meetings and on the Internet -- could be abused by people seeking to make biological weapons.
AD3263 -- CORRUPTION PERCEPTIONS INDEX 2003 (Transparency International , October 7, 2003, 4 printed pages)
The TI Corruption Perceptions Index (CPI) this year ranks 133 countries in terms of the degree to which corruption is perceived to exist among public officials and politicians.
It is a composite index, drawing on 17 different polls and surveys from 13 independent institutions carried out among business people and country analysts, including surveys of residents, both local and expatriate.
In 2002, the CPI included only 102 countries.
The large increase in coverage relates to the fact that more valid and reputable sources have been found that can be incorporated.
AD3264 -- Delgado, Christopher L.; Wada, Nikolas; Rosegrant, Mark W.; Meijer, Siet; Ahmed, Mahfuzuddin.
OUTLOOK FOR FISH TO 2020: MEETING GLOBAL DEMAND (International Food Policy Research Institute (IFPRI), October 2, 2003, 52 pages)
Using a global model of supply and demand for food and feed commodities, this report projects the likely changes in the fisheries sector over the next two decades given present trends.
As prices for most food commodities fall, fish prices are expected to rise, reflecting demand for fish that outpaces the ability of the world to supply it.
Alternative scenarios using different assumptions are also investigated.
AD3265 -- Cline, William R. RESTORING ECONOMIC GROWTH IN ARGENTINA (World Bank, October 9, 2003, 111 pages)
Argentina experienced three decades of deteriorating growth performance during 1960-1990, culminating in hyperinflation.
In the 1990s, however, Argentina made impressive gains in structural reform, achieved price stability, and outperformed by a significant margin the average per capita growth record of middle-income countries.
The Argentine economic renaissance stalled out by 1999, however, and a protracted recession intensified into a cataclysm of default, devaluation, and depression in 2002.
After average growth of 5.8 percent annually in 1991-98, real GDP fell 3.4 percent in 1999, 0.8 percent in 2000, 4.4 percent in 2001, and 10.9 percent in 2002.
Real GDP has thus fallen a total of 18.4 percent, and per capita GDP, by 22.3 percent from its peak in 1998.
This study seeks to identify possible paths back to sustained growth in Argentina.
AD3266 -- Audley, John.
BAD BILATERAL TRADE DEALS ARE NO BETTER THAN BAD MULTILATERAL DEALS (Carnegie Endowment for International Peace (CEIP), October 2003, 2 pages)
U.S. Trade Representative (USTR) Ambassador Robert Zoellick believes that he can increase U.S. leverage at the WTO by negotiating U.S. trade positions into smaller, less economically significant, trade agreements.
Already USTR deputies are laying the groundwork for this new emphasis on FTAs, arguing everything from promoting national security by securing deals with friendly Muslim countries (Morocco and Bahrain), to strengthening fledgling democracies (Central America) and creating jobs for Americans.
AD3267 -- UNITED NATIONS / WORLD BANK JOINT IRAQ NEEDS ASSESSMENT (United Nations Development Group (UNDG) and World Bank, October 2003, 89 pages)
The report highlights the following development priorities for Iraq: (1) strengthening institutions of sovereign, transparent, and good government; (2) restoring critical infrastructure and core human services destroyed and degraded by years of misrule and conflict; and (3) supporting an economic and social transition that provides both growth and social protection.
AD3268 -- CRITICAL ISSUES IN WEATHER MODIFICATION RESEARCH.
REPORT IN BRIEF (National Research Council, Board on Atmospheric Sciences and Climate, October 13, 2003, 4 pages)
The report is the latest in a series of assessments of weather modification carried out by the National Academies; all of these reports have concluded that the science underlying attempts to modify the weather is too weak to prove that such attempts actually produce results.
Since the last Academy report on the subject in 1973, however, there have been significant advances in observational, computational, and statistical technologies, allowing a more thorough investigation of the complex processes in the atmosphere, the new report says.
Still, little of this collective power has been applied in any coherent way to weather modification.
AD3269 -- Mark, Clyde.
ISRAELI-UNITED STATES RELATIONS (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, Updated October 10, 2003, 18 pages)
Israel and the United States share the view that the United States has a predominant role and responsibility in Middle East peace-making, but in the past Israel has disagreed with the U.S. view of its role as an even-handed peace broker among the parties to the Arab-Israeli dispute.
Most Israelis and Israeli supporters have wanted the United States to favor only Israeli positions.
The United States has provided arms to Middle Eastern countries for individual and collective defense against aggression.
Past U.S. arms transfers to Arab countries have been striking examples of friction in Israeli-U.S. relations, not only because they underscore the difference in attitudes toward Arab countries, but because Israel perceived arms transfers to Arabs as threatening its security.
AD3270 -- Ikenberry, John.
STRATEGIC REACTIONS TO AMERICAN PREEMINENCE: GREAT POWER POLITICS IN THE AGE OF UNIPOLARITY (United States Central Intelligence Agency (CIA), National Intelligence Council (NIC), July 28, 2003, Web-posted October 10, 2003, 21 printed pages)
The author provides an intriguing history of the rise of U.S. power in the world.
He argues that "the rise of American "unipolarity" -- has unsettled world politics.
Governments everywhere are worried about the uncertainties and insecurities that appear to flow from such extreme and unprecedented disparities of power.
The shifting global security environment-triggered by the terrorist attacks of September 11th-also has conspired to upset old relationships and expectations.
The American invasions of Afghanistan and Iraq have put American power on display and raised far-reaching questions about the use of force, alliances, weapons of mass destruction, sovereignty and interventionism."
AD3271 -- Shin, Hyon B.; Bruno, Rosalind.
LANGUAGE USE AND ENGLISH-SPEAKING ABILITY: 2000 (United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census, October 8, 2003, 11 pages)
In the United States in 2000, 18 percent of the total population aged 5 and over, or 47.0 million people, reported they spoke a language other than English at home.
People who spoke languages other than English at home were not distributed equally across or within regions in 2000.
While the West had only slightly more than one-fifth of the U.S. population aged 5 and over, it was home to more than one-third (37 percent) of all non-English-language speakers, the highest proportion of any region.
Within regions, the proportion who spoke a non-English language at home was 29 percent in the West, 20 percent in the Northeast, 15 percent in the South, and only 9 percent in the Midwest.
AD3272 -- "LET'S TALK ABOUT DRUGS . . .": HIV/AIDS AND DRUG ABUSE (United Nations Office on Drugs and Crime (UNODC), Web-posted September 24, 2003)
Two one-page fact sheets and five short radio spots are available in English, French and Swahili at the url noted below.
The fact sheets are entitled: "General information about HIV/AIDS and drug abuse" and "HIV/AIDS myths and misinformation common in Africa"; both provide basic information designed to inform people of the nature of HIV/AIDS infections and how they can or cannot be transmitted.
The radio spots cover the following Interactions: 1) Teacher and student discussing how you get infected with HIV. (female voices); 2) Doctor informing a patient what it means that she is HIV-positive.
(female voices); 3) Doctor informing a patient what it means that he is HIV-positive.
(male voices); 4) Dispelling a myth about how you get infected with HIV; (male voices); 5) Taking drugs and making bad decisions can lead to HIV/AIDS, which affects you and your family.
(male voice ? one radio spot with music, one without music).
[wwwgtop.gif]
October 2003 AD3228 -- Clark, Sandra Luckett; Weismantle, Mai.
EMPLOYMENT STATUS: 2000 (United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census, August 22, 2003, 12 pages)
The questions on labor force participation are key to understanding work and unemployment patterns and the availability of workers.
The Department of Labor identifies service delivery areas and determines amounts to be allocated for job training based on labor markets and unemployment levels.
The impact of immigration on the economy and job markets is measured partially by labor force data, which is included in required reports to Congress.
Under the Job Training Partnership Act, labor force data are used to allocate funds and identify programs that create new jobs in local areas with substantial unemployment.
Also, areas with substantial unemployment are targeted for housing and community development projects under the Community Development Block Grant Program.
AD3229 -- HOMELAND SECURITY: EFFORTS TO IMPROVE INFORMATION SHARING NEED TO BE STRENGTHENED (United States General Accounting Office, August 27, 2003, 59 pages)
Since September 11, 2001, federal, state, and city governments have established initiatives to improve the sharing of information to prevent terrorism.
Many of these initiatives were implemented by states and cities and not necessarily coordinated with other sharing initiatives, including those by federal agencies.
At the same time, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) has initiatives under way to enhance information sharing, including the development of a homeland security blueprint, known as an "enterprise architecture," to integrate sharing between federal, state, and city authorities.
The sharing of information by federal authorities to state and city governments is critical to effectively execute and unify homeland security efforts.
This report examines (1) what initiatives have been undertaken to improve information sharing and (2) whether federal, state, and city officials believe that the current information-sharing process is effective.
AD3230 -- Gallagher, Kevin P. THE ENVIRONMENTAL REVIEW OF THE FTAA: EXAMINING THE U.S. APPROACH (Carnegie Endowment for International Peace (CEIP), August 26, 2003, 8 pages)
By explicitly giving Congress the power to determine whether environmental issues are effectively incorporated into U.S. trade negotiations, the Trade Act of 2002 institutionalizes a tool for ensuring that the environment is considered in U.S. trade policy.
This tool, the environmental review (ER), is a written assessment of the potential environmental benefits and costs of agreements being considered by U.S. trade policy makers.
ERs conducted for past agreements, such as the bilateral free trade agreements with Jordan and Singapore, have received criticism for poor methodology and untimely submission.
These shortcomings threaten to undermine the efficacy of ERs and further erode the American public's confidence in U.S. trade policy.
The author recommends that beginning with the ER for the FTAA, Congress should examine the methods and processes applied to ERs under the Trade Act of 2002 to ensure that ERs are used to inform trade negotiations in a timely manner, not simply to justify predetermined trade positions.
AD3231 -- Mark, Clyde.
PALESTINIANS AND MIDDLE EAST PEACE: ISSUES FOR THE UNITED STATES (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, Updated August 26, 2003, 18 pages)
Palestinian Prime Minister Mahmud Abbas and Israeli Prime Minister Ariel Sharon met in Jerusalem in May and again at Aqaba on June 4, 2003, to discuss implementing the road map, but the two leaders did not agreed on how the plan should be implemented.
After a relative calm following a July 2003 cease-fire agreement, a series of attacks, terror incidents, and retaliatory strikes in August ended near-term prospects of implementing the road map.
On August 25, 2003, Palestinian President Arafat named Jabril Rajub as head of security and Nasir Yusuf as Interior Minister in moves that challenged the leadership of Prime Minister Abbas, who had named Muhammad Dahlan as Minister of Security and held the Interior Ministry for himself.
At stake is control of the Palestinian Authority police and intelligence units, and perhaps control of the Palestinian Authority.
AD3232 -- GENDER, HEALTH, AND DEVELOPMENT IN THE AMERICAS 2003 (Pan American Health Organization, September 3, 2003, 12 pages)
This data sheet profiles gender differences in health and development in 48 countries in the Americas, focusing on women's reproductive health, access to key health services, and major causes of death.
Its objective is to raise awareness of gender inequities in the region and to promote the use of sex-disaggregated health statistics for policies and programs.
This effort is consistent with the United Nations' Millennium Development Goals, adopted by 189 member countries at the UN Millennium Summit (2000), which focus on achieving measurable improvements in people's lives, including greater gender equality.
AD3233 -- LOCKED DOORS: THE HUMAN RIGHTS OF PEOPLE LIVING WITH HIV/AIDS IN CHINA (Human Rights Watch (HRW), September 3, 2003, 80 pages)
According to this Human Rights Watch report, widespread discrimination against people with HIV/AIDS is fueling the spread of the epidemic in China.
Many people living with HIV/AIDS have no access to health care because hospitals refuse to treat them.
National laws discriminate against people with HIV/AIDS, and some local laws ban them from using swimming pools or working in food service.
The police send drug users to detoxification centers, where they are forced to labor without pay to make trinkets for tourists.
Instead of receiving help for their problem, they are driven underground, making it harder for the government to combat the AIDS virus.
AD3234 -- SPECIAL OPERATIONS FORCES [SOF] POSTURE STATEMENT (United States Department of Defense, United States Special Operations Command, July 14, 2003, 118 pages)
Special operations are operations conducted in hostile, denied, or politically sensitive environments to achieve military, diplomatic, informational, and/or economic objectives employing military capabilities for which there is no broad conventional force requirement.
These operations often require covert, clandestine, or discreet capabilities.
Special operations are applicable across the range of military operations.
They can be conducted independently or in conjunction with operations of conventional forces or other government agencies and may include operations by, with, or through indigenous or surrogate forces.
AD3235 -- FOREIGN AFFAIRS: EFFECTIVE STEWARDSHIP OF RESOURCES ESSENTIAL TO EFFICIENT OPERATIONS AT STATE DEPARTMENT, USAID (Testimony of Jess T. Ford, Director, International Affairs and Trade, Before the House Committee on International Relations, United States General Accounting Office, September 4, 2003, 28 pages)
In his testimony, Ford emphasizes the Department of State's and USAID's management in the following five areas: (1) unneeded real estate; (2) embassy construction; (3) overseas presence and staffing, including rightsizing; (4) information technology; and (5) strategic planning.
According to GAO, State has increased its attention to managing resources, and its efforts are starting to show results, including potential cost savings and improved operational effectiveness and efficiency.
AD3236 -- U.S. PUBLIC DIPLOMACY: STATE DEPARTMENT EXPANDS EFFORTS BUT FACES SIGNIFICANT CHALLENGES (United States General Accounting Office, September 4, 2003, 74 pages)
The terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, focused attention on the need to improve public diplomacy efforts to cultivate a better public opinion of the United States abroad.
However, recent opinion research indicates that many foreign publics, especially in countries with significant Muslim populations, view the United States unfavorably.
GAO examined changes in the State Department's (State) public diplomacy efforts since September 11, whether State has an overall strategy for its public diplomacy programs, how it measures their effectiveness, and challenges it faces in implementing these programs.
AD3237 -- GLOBAL ECONOMIC PROSPECTS 2004: REALIZING THE DEVELOPMENT PROMISE OF THE DOHA AGENDA (World Bank, Web-posted September 3, 2003, 334 pages)
This report presents a detailed overview of the world economy and the near-term outlook.
It also offers a rigorous analysis of global trade issues, particularly those that head the agenda for discussion at the WTO meeting this month in Cancun.
Officially, the Cancun meetings are an interim stocktaking for the negotiations, which are scheduled for completion by January 1, 2005.
However, the meetings occur at a time when the global economy and international trade are languishing.
As the report notes, the trade talks are stalled over disagreements on issues of particular importance to developing countries, such as agriculture, tariff reductions on manufactures, special treatment for developing countries, and drug patents in poor countries.
Progress in Cancun could bolster investor confidence, and create momentum towards a more significant WTO agreement that would spur trade.
Such a result would eventually raise incomes around the world, leading over time to a substantial reduction in global poverty.
AD3238 -- Del Castillo, Carlos Perez; Panitchpakdi, Supachai.
DRAFT CANCUN MINISTERIAL TEXT (World Trade Organization, August 31, 2003, 22 printed pages)
WTO General Council chairperson Carlos Perez del Castillo and Director-General Supachai Panitchpakdi submitted their draft Cancun.
Ministerial Declaration to ministers on 31 August 2003.
In a covering letter, they stress that it has not been agreed "in any part", and does not include many of the member governments' proposals.
Rather, it serves as a summary of major issues that will be discussed at the ministerial.
AD3239 -- Gray, Colin S. MAINTAINING EFFECTIVE DETERRENCE (U.S. Army War College, Strategic Studies Institute, August 2003, 69 pages)
The purpose of this monograph is to explore the state of deterrence now, and to see what can and should be saved from the wreckage of what once was the keystone in the arch of American strategic thought, policy, and strategy.
To do this, the text begins by explaining how and why deterrence has fallen out of fashion.
Next, it proceeds to detail the main elements in what fairly can be termed the current crisis of deterrence.
Finally, this study outlines some practical measures, both quite general as well as specific to U.S. land-power, which should maximize the prospects for deterrence being all that it can be, admittedly in some truly demanding circumstances.
AD3240 -- Gandhi, Sajit.
THE SEPTEMBER 11TH SOURCEBOOKS.
VOLUME VII: THE TALIBAN FILE (George Washington University, National Security Archives, September 11, 2003, 15 printed pages)
"The Taliban File," is the seventh volume in the National Security Archive's September 11th Sourcebook series, recognized by the National Journal in December 2001 as one of the top five sites on the Web for terrorism information.
The collection of 32 documents obtained through the U.S. Freedom of Information Act by Archive research associate Sajit Gandhi details the rise of the Taliban from its meager start in Kandahar to a full fledged military force and ultimate control of the country.
The documents discuss Pakistan's support for the Taliban, U.S. dealings with the Taliban, post 9/11 thinking on military strategy in the War on Terror, and the relationship between the assassination of the Northern Alliance Commander Ahmad Shah Masoud and the terrorist attacks of September 11.
AD3241 -- SARS: DOWN BUT STILL A THREAT (United States Central Intelligence Agency, National Intelligence Center, August 2003, 26 printed pages)
The wave of Severe Acute Respiratory Syndrome (SARS) has been overcome, but SARS has not been eradicated.
Although the World Health Organization declared on 5 July that all transmission chains of SARS had been broken, many health experts fear it could return again in the fall when cooler temperatures return in temperate areas.
We remain vulnerable.
* The possible presence of animal reservoirs of the corona virus that causes SARS and the lack of a reliable diagnostic test or a vaccine preclude eradication.
* If a resurgence of SARS this winter coincides with the annual outbreak of influenza, identifying and isolating suspected SARS cases will be much more difficult.
SARS also could mutate, altering the symptoms, transmissibility, or lethality of the disease.
* As the first line of defense, healthcare systems and workers are particularly vulnerable.
Moreover, most wealthy countries have little recent experience implementing large-scale quarantine and isolation programs, and poor countries already have inadequate health surveillance and infection control procedures.
AD3242 -- Caulkins, Jonathan P.; Reuter, Peter; Iguchi, Martin Y.; Chiesa, James.
DRUG USE AND DRUG POLICY FUTURES: INSIGHTS FROM A COLLOQUIUM (RAND, September 16, 2003, 7 printed pages)
A focus on the present may be proper if drug problems and policy are static over the long term, but they are not.
The authors maintain that the stability of the past decade or more is an exception.
Epidemics of drug use in the United States occurred not only in the 1960s, 1970s, and 1980s, but also as far back as the late 19th century.
American drug policy was quite different a hundred years ago, and in recent years it has changed rapidly in other developed countries.
The discussants in this colloquium argue that drug problems and policy could change rapidly again over the next 5 to 20 years, and bear close watching.
AD3243 -- Thomas, Kenneth R. FEDERALISM, STATE SOVEREIGNTY AND THE CONSTITUTION: BASIS AND LIMITS OF CONGRESSIONAL POWER (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, Updated September 5, 2003, 23 pages)
The ratification of the Constitution, to a significant extent, defined the lines of authority between the state and federal governments.
Over recent years, the Supreme Court has decided a number of cases which address this historical relationship.
This report discusses state and federal legislative power generally and focuses on a number of these "federalism" cases.
Issues addressed include congressional power under the Commerce Clause and the Fourteenth Amendment; constitutional limits on congressional powers, such as the Tenth Amendment; and state sovereign immunity under the Eleventh Amendment.
AD3244 -- PRIVACY AND HUMAN RIGHTS 2003: AN INTERNATIONAL SURVEY OF PRIVACY LAWS AND DEVELOPMENTS (Electronic Privacy Information Center (EPIC) and Privacy International, September 2003, Various Pagings)
According to the authors of this report, a major shift has taken place in the political and legal landscape of many countries around the globe in the last two years: governments have seized the response to the threat of terrorism to enhance their powers, affecting many fundamental human rights, including privacy.
Many have adapted their political discourse, given new life to proposals that had previously failed, broadened the definitions of "terrorism" and "terrorists," passed laws giving them enhanced powers for one purpose, the war on terrorism, and applied them for others, such as the suppression of dissent and the general surveillance and profiling of people's activities.
In some cases, they have modeled policies and legal measures from other countries with little consideration to their own cultural and political specificities.
AD3245 -- WORLD DEVELOPMENT REPORT 2004: MAKING SERVICES WORK FOR POOR PEOPLE (World Bank Web Draft, Updated September 20, 2003, Various Pagings)
To make services work for poor people, governments and citizens use a variety of methods?central-government provision, contracting out to the private sector and NGOs, decentralization to local governments, community participation, and direct transfers to households.
There have been spectacular successes?and spectacular failures.
Both point to the need to strengthen accountability in three key relationships in the service delivery chain: between poor people and providers, between poor people and policymakers, and between policymakers and providers.
Donors should reinforce the accountability of these relationships, not undermine it.
AD3246 -- CONSTANT CHANGE: A HISTORY OF FEDERAL TAXES DECODING CANCUN: HARD DECISIONS FOR A DEVELOPMENT ROUND (Congress of the United States, Joint Economic Committee, September 12, 2003, 7 pages)
This report, the first in a series of documents from the JEC on tax simplification and tax reform, provides an accessible overview of the history of the federal tax system in the United States, including the introduction and continued use of the payroll withholding system.
The current tax code is the product of an ongoing legislative process influenced both by shifts in the philosophy of taxation and by growth in understanding the economic implications of taxation.
The result is an extraordinarily complex code that is frequently at cross-purposes with itself.
This report highlights the major trends in the U.S. tax system since the beginning of the income tax, and especially over the last several decades, to illustrate how we arrived at the current tax system.
Such an historical perspective on the tax system is crucial for understanding the motivations of features of the current code and evaluating proposals for simplification and reform.
[wwwgtop.gif]
September 2003 AD3207 -- Greene, Jay; Forster, Greg; Winters, Marcus A. APPLES TO APPLES: AN EVALUATION OF CHARTER SCHOOLS SERVING GENERAL STUDENT POPULATIONS (Manhattan Institute, July 2003, 24 pages)
Charter schools?public schools that are exempt from many of the procedural regulations that apply to regular public schools?are a widespread but poorly-studied form of education reform.
With nearly 2,700 charter schools now educating more than 684,000 children nationwide, policymakers and parents need to know how the education charter schools provide compares to that provided by regular public schools.
Assessing the academic performance of charter schools is difficult, because many charter schools are targeted toward specific populations such as at-risk students, disabled students, and juvenile delinquents.
This makes it very challenging for researchers to draw a fair comparison?comparing targeted charter schools to regular public schools is like comparing apples and zebras.
As a result, there are very few reliable research findings on the academic quality of charter schools as compared to regular public schools.
This is the first national empirical study of charter schools that compares apples to apples?that is, test scores at charter schools and regular public schools serving similar student populations.
By comparing "untargeted" charter schools serving the general population to their closest neighboring regular public schools, we can draw a fair comparison and get an accurate picture of how well charter schools are performing.
AD3208 -- Jasinski, Michael.
RUSSIA'S NUCLEAR AND MISSILE TECHNOLOGY ASSISTANCE TO IRAN (Monterey Institute of International Studies, Center for Nonproliferation Studies (CNS), July 2003, 4 printed pages)
Russian assistance for the Iranian nuclear program has long been an irritant in the U.S.-Russian relations.
The revelations concerning Iran's hitherto unknown uranium enrichment efforts, which propelled Iran's nuclear ambitions to the center of the world's attention, added a new dimension to the controversy.
In a report released on June 18, 2003, the International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA) criticized Iran for failing to report a number of nuclear activities.
Nevertheless, the IAEA did not impose sanctions on Iran, though it did enjoin it to sign an additional protocol pursuant to its nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty (NPT) obligations, which would enable the IAEA to inspect any suspected nuclear site in Iran, rather than just declared nuclear sites.
These developments have signaled a new phase in the long U.S.-Russian dispute over Russia's nuclear projects in Iran.
AD3209 -- THE TRANSPARENCY INTERNATIONAL GLOBAL CORRUPTION BAROMETER (Transparency International, July 3, 2003, 32 pages)
Three out of ten respondents singled out political parties as the institution from which they would like to eliminate corruption if they were given a magic wand, according to the Global Corruption Barometer, a new survey of the general public in 48 countries on all continents.
The survey was commissioned from Gallup International by Transparency International.
The Global Corruption Barometer measures attitudes towards corruption and expectations of future corruption levels.
Over time, the survey will measure trends in attitudes.
Political parties were revealed in 33 of the countries surveyed to be the institution from which citizens would most like to eliminate corruption.
This preference was most acutely expressed in Argentina and Japan, where more than half of all respondents picked political parties.
The courts were identified by one in seven respondents worldwide, most notably in Peru and Indonesia, where they were pinpointed by one in three.
The police were singled out by one in nine respondents worldwide, and by one in three in Hong Kong, Malaysia, Mexico and Nigeria.
In Bosnia and Herzegovina, Croatia, Georgia and Poland, one in five selected medical services.
AD3210 -- ANNUAL REPORT ON THE MILITARY POWER OF THE PEOPLE'S REPUBLIC OF CHINA: REPORT TO CONGRESS PURSUANT TO THE FY2000 NATIONAL DEFENSE AUTHORIZATION ACT (United States Department of Defense, July 28, 2003, Web-posted July 30, 2003, 52 pages)
According to this new Pentagon report, "China has embarked upon a force modernization program intended to diversify its options for use of force against potential targets such as Taiwan, the South China Sea and border defense, and to complicate United States intervention in a Taiwan Strait conflict.
Preparing for a potential conflict in the Taiwan Strait is the primary driver for China's military modernization.
While it professes a preference for resolving the Taiwan issue peacefully, Beijing is also seeking credible military options.
Should China use force against Taiwan, its primary goal likely would be to compel a quick negotiated solution on terms favorable to Beijing."
"China is developing advanced information technology and long-range precision strike capabilities, and looking for ways to target and exploit the perceived weaknesses of technologically superior adversaries.
In particular, Beijing has greatly expanded its arsenal of increasingly accurate and lethal ballistic missiles and long-range strike aircraft that are ready for immediate application should the PLA be called upon to conduct war before its modernization aspirations are fully realized.
" "China's force modernization program is heavily reliant upon assistance from Russia and other states of the Former Soviet Union.
China hopes to fill short-term gaps in capabilities by significantly expanding its procurement of Russian weapon systems and technical assistance over the next several years.
The success of China's force modernization, however, will depend upon its ability to overcome a number of technical, logistical, and training obstacles.
"
AD3211 -- WORLD TRADE ORGANIZATION: STANDARD OF REVIEW AND IMPACT OF TRADE REMEDY RULINGS (United States General Accounting Office, July 30, 2003, 128 pages)
World Trade Organization (WTO) members rely on trade remedies in the form of duties or other import restrictions to protect their industries from injury due to unfair foreign trade practices or unexpected import surges.
There is congressional concern that the WTO, created in 1995 to administer trade rules, is interfering with this ability.
There is also congressional concern that the WTO is not treating the United States fairly in resolving trade remedy disputes.
A congressional requester asked GAO to identify trends in WTO trade remedy disputes since 1995, including the outcomes of these disputes and how they affected members' ability to impose trade remedies.
The requester also asked GAO to discuss the standards of review that the WTO applies when ruling on trade remedy disputes and to present U.S. agencies' and legal experts' views on the WTO's application of these standards and related trade remedy issues.
GAO found that about a third of the cases filed in the WTO dispute settlement system from 1995 through 2002 challenged members' trade remedies, with the ratio of such cases increasing over time.
Although a relatively small proportion of WTO members' trade remedy measures were challenged in the WTO, the United States faced substantially more challenges than other WTO members.
The WTO generally rejected members' decisions to impose trade remedies in the 25 trade remedy disputes resolved from 1995 through 2002.
However, GAO found that the WTO ruled for and against the U.S. and other members in roughly the same ratios.
Overall, WTO rulings resulted in few changes to members' laws, regulations, and practices but had a relatively greater impact on those of the United States.
While U.S. agencies stated that WTO rulings have not yet significantly impaired their ability to impose trade remedies, they had concerns about the potential future adverse impact of WTO rulings.
Of the legal experts GAO consulted, a majority concluded that the WTO has properly applied standards of review and correctly ruled on major trade remedy issues.
However, a significant minority strongly disagreed with these conclusions.
U.S. agencies also said that the WTO has not always properly applied the standards and has, in some cases, imposed obligations on members that are not found in WTO agreements.
Nonetheless, the experts almost unanimously agreed that the WTO was not treating the United States any differently than other members.
AD3212 -- INTERNATIONAL TRADE: EXPERTS' ADVICE FOR SMALL BUSINESSES SEEKING FOREIGN PATENTS (United States General Accounting Office, June 2003, Web-posted July 28, 2003, 66 pages)
Foreign patent laws can differ from U.S. patent law in many important respects.
For example, other countries differ from the United States in how they award patents in the case of competing applications for the same invention.
This is referred to as the "priority principle."
All countries except the United States award patents to the first inventor to file a patent application, a method called "first-to-file."
The United States awards patents to the inventor that can demonstrate it was the first to invent the item in question.
These two systems engender very different patent filing approaches.
One encourages rapid use of the patent system, while the other does not.
The most important step that small businesses could take to improve their foreign patent efforts, according to GAO's survey of patent law experts, is to avoid disclosing information publicly about an invention before filing a U.S. patent application.
The United States permits such disclosure, but doing so can invalidate an applicant's right to patent protection abroad.
The second most important step is to be aware of filing deadlines, which are specified in foreign laws and international patent treaties.
Other important steps included integrating foreign patents into long-range business planning and seeking patents in countries where meaningful protection is available and a return on investment is likely.
AD3213 -- Hoekman, Bernard; Michalopoulos, Constantine; Winters, Alan.
MORE FAVORABLE AND DIFFERENTIAL TREATMENT OF DEVELOPING COUNTRIES: TOWARDS A NEW APPROACH IN THE WTO (World Bank, August 1, 2003, 31 pages)
This paper discusses options that could be considered in the WTO to respond to the call of WTO trade ministers to make special and differential treatment (SDT) provisions in the WTO more effective.
The authors argue for a new approach that puts the emphasis on nondiscriminatory liberalization of trade in goods and services in which developing countries have an export interest; complemented by efforts to improve the development relevance of WTO rules and consideration of mechanisms to allow for greater differentiation across WTO members in determining the reach of WTO disciplines.
AD3214 -- Frumkin, Peter.
MAKING PUBLIC SECTOR MERGERS WORK: LESSONS LEARNED (IBM Center for the Business of Government, Web-posted August 6, 2003, 44 pages)
The last several years have seen a revival of interest in government reorganization.
New organizations have been created by legislative action.
In 1999, the National Nuclear Safety Administration was created and began operations in the Department of Energy in 2000.
In 2001, the Transportation Safety Administration was created in the aftermath of September 11.
Last year, the Department of Homeland Security was created.
Other agencies, such as the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms, and Explosives, have moved from one department to another.
Legislation has been introduced in Congress to reassess the organization of the entire government.
One can speculate that the coming years will see additional reorganizations.
The report by Professor Frumkin describes many of the challenges now facing the Department of Homeland Security.
While the decision to merge related organizations has already been made, there are still many merger challenges facing the new department.
Specifically, the department now faces the challenge of creating a new culture and making critical adjustments over time.
Based on the experiences of other mergers, Professor Frumkin argues that the Department of Homeland Security can clearly learn from them.
AD3215 -- Lindsey, Brink.
THE TRADE FRONT: COMBATING TERRORISM WITH OPEN MARKETS (Cato Institute, August 5, 2003, 16 pages)
In May 2003 President Bush announced plans to create a U.S.-Middle East free-trade area within a decade.
The new trade initiative aims to combat terrorism, and the Islamist extremism that underlies it, by promoting economic and political development in the Muslim world.
The administration moved quickly to begin putting its plans into action by announcing that the United States and Bahrain would soon commence negotiations for a free-trade agreement (FTA).
Meanwhile, negotiations for an FTA with Morocco are already under way, and a U.S.-Jordan FTA, now in its second year, has produced a boom in Jordanian exports.
The fact is, though, that negotiating FTAs will take time.
Relatively few countries in the region are ready to begin serious talks.
Hammering out all the details of a mutually acceptable agreement with those that are prepared to take the plunge - and then guiding that agreement through approval by Congress - will be a complex, contentious, and time-consuming process.
A U.S.-Middle East free-trade area, however desirable, is a policy goal for the long term.
Meanwhile, the administration's initiative fails to include Turkey, Afghanistan, or Pakistan-all countries with obvious geopolitical significance.
AD3216-Overview and Essay, Country Reports, Tables and Charts, Map of Freedom -- FREEDOM IN THE WORLD 2003 (Freedom House, Web-posted July 23, 2003, 13 printed pages)
What do Burma, Cuba, Iraq, Libya, North Korea, Saudi Arabia, Sudan, Syria and Turkmenistan have in common? According to Freedom House, these are the "least free" countries in the world.
Since 1978, Freedom House has published Freedom in the World, an annual comparative assessment of the state of political rights and civil liberties in 192 countries and 18 related and disputed territories.
This year 22 countries registered significant improvements in the expansion of political rights and/or civil liberties without changing categories, while only 9 countries saw an erosion of political rights and/or civil liberties.
Taken together, category changes and numerical changes registered in the survey yielded upward momentum for 28 countries and regression away from freedom for 11 countries?a margin of nearly three to one.
Minor adjustments to the survey methodology led to upward trends in 14 additional countries and to downward trends in 3.
AD3217 -- INCORPORATING HIV PREVENTION INTO THE MEDICAL CARE OF PERSONS LIVING WITH HIV (United States Centers for Disease Control and Transmission (CDC), July 18, 2003, 39 printed pages)
Reducing transmission of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) in the United States requires new strategies, including emphasis on prevention of transmission by HIV-infected persons.
Through ongoing attention to prevention, risky sexual and needle-sharing behaviors among persons with HIV infection can be reduced and transmission of HIV infection prevented.
Medical care providers can substantially affect HIV transmission by screening their HIV-infected patients for risk behaviors; communicating prevention messages; discussing sexual and drug-use behavior; positively reinforcing changes to safer behavior; referring patients for services such as substance abuse treatment; facilitating partner notification, counseling, and testing; and identifying and treating other sexually transmitted diseases (STDs).
AD3218 -- SENATE ETHICS MANUAL (United States Senate, Select Committee on Ethics, 2003, 542 pages)
Rules and regulations for U.S. Senators regarding: gifts; conflicts of interest and outside earned income; prohibition on unofficial office accounts; financial disclosure; political activity; use of the frank [free postage], stationery, and senate facilities; constituent services; employment practices; and more specific matters.
AD3219 -- Perl, Raphael.
DRUG CONTROL: INTERNATIONAL POLICY AND APPROACHES (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, Updated August 3, 2003)
In Congressional testimony on July 10, 2003, Acting State Department INL Assistant Secretary Paul E. Simons announced that coca cultivation in Colombia during the year 2002 had declined overall by more than 15%, a development he characterized as a "direct result of the robust U.S.-assisted aerial eradication program."
According to Administration figures, the U.S. has provided over $1.7 billion in economic, humanitarian, and security assistance to Colombia to combat the damaging effects of illicit narcotics on the United States and Colombia, with another $600 million appropriated for fiscal year 2003.
Even at current production levels, however, coca cultivation in the Andean Ridge remains more than adequate to sustain both current and immediately foreseeable U.S. and world demand for cocaine.
AD3220 -- 2003 WORLD POPULATION DATA SHEET OF THE POPULATION REFERENCE BUREAU: DEMOGRAPHIC DATA AND ESTIMATES FOR THE COUNTRIES AND REGIONS OF THE WORLD (Population Reference Bureau, Web-posted August 2003, 14 pages)
With every passing year, prospects for population growth in the more developed and less developed countries grow more dissimilar.
On this year's Data Sheet, the total fertility rate (TFR) for the more developed countries is a mere 1.5, compared with 3.1 in the less developed countries?3.5 if China's large statistical effect is removed.
Middle Africa is expected to be the fastest growing region in the first half of the 21st century, growing to 193 percent of its current size by 2050; western Africa follows, increasing to 142 percent of its 2003 population.
The population of HIV/AIDS-ravaged southern Africa is projected to fall by 22 percent, a decline that no one would have predicted in the recent past.
In Latin America and the Caribbean, Central America is expected to grow by 60 percent, while the Caribbean will grow by 36 percent and South America by 42 percent.
In Asia, western Asia is projected to grow by 105 percent, while eastern Asia, home to 1.5 billion people, is expected to increase by just 5 percent, due largely to China's low fertility rate.
In Europe, northern Europe is expected to grow slightly, with a 6 percent gain, while the rest of the continent will decline.
AD3221 -- HOMELAND DEFENSE: DOD NEEDS TO ASSESS THE STRUCTURE OF U.S. FORCES FOR DOMESTIC MILITARY MISSIONS (House of Representatives, United States General Accounting Office (GAO), Web-posted August 11, 2003, 46 pages)
The threat of terrorism has altered some military operations.
For example, as of September 11, 2001, the North American Aerospace Defense Command (NORAD) orders combat air patrols over U.S. cities to prevent terrorist attacks.
The 1878 Posse Comitatus Act prohibits the direct use of federal military troops in domestic civilian law enforcement, except where authorized by the Constitution or acts of Congress.
Congress has expressly authorized the use of the military in certain situations such as to assist with terrorist incidents involving weapons of mass destruction.
DOD has established new organizations (such as U.S. Northern Command) and implemented a campaign plan for domestic military missions, but it has not evaluated or adjusted its force structure.
GAO did not assess the adequacy of the new organizations or the campaign plan because the organizations were not yet fully operational, and the campaign plan was only recently completed.
DOD's force structure is not well tailored to perform domestic military missions and may not be able to sustain the high pace of operations that preceded and followed the attacks on September 11, 2001.
While on domestic military missions, combat units are unable to maintain proficiency because these missions provide less opportunity to practice the varied skills required for combat and consequently offer little training value.
In addition, from September 2001 through December 2002, the number of service members exceeding the established personnel tempo thresholds increased substantially, indicating that the present force structure may not be sufficient to address the increase in domestic and overseas military missions.
As a result, U.S. forces could experience an unsustainable pace that could significantly erode their readiness to perform combat missions and impact future personnel retention.
AD3222 -- OCCUPATIONS: 2000 (United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census, August 11, 2003, 14 pages)
About a third (33.6 percent) of the nation's civilian workers were employed in management, professional and related jobs and 26.7 percent were in sales and office occupations, according to this Census 2000 brief published by the U.S. Census Bureau.
The report analyzes the occupations of the nearly 130 million civilian workers age 16 and older by region, state, county and selected metropolitan areas.
The brief also shows occupation data by gender, race, Hispanic origin and industry.
Differences in earnings by men and women with similar jobs also are covered.
The data are based on responses from a sample of households that received the census long form, about 1-in-6 nationally, and are subject to sampling and nonsampling error.
AD3223 -- Hanrahan, Charles E. AGRICULTURAL EXPORT AND FOOD AID PROGRAMS (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, Updated July 24, 2003, 19 pages)
The U.S. Department of Agriculture (USDA) forecasts that FY2003 agricultural exports will be $56 billion.
Projected imports of $43.5 billion will result in an export surplus of $10.5 billion, $1.8 billion less than in FY2002.
USDA operates four kinds of programs to promote agricultural exports including food aid.
The programs are authorized in the 2002 farm bill (P.L. 107-171), the Farm Security and Rural Investment Act (FSRIA), and permanent legislation.
These programs include: direct subsidies, market promotion, export credit guarantees, and foreign food aid.
Legislative authority for most of these programs now extends to the end of 2007.
Export subsidies, but not other U.S. export and food aid programs, are subject to reduction commitments agreed to in multilateral trade negotiations.
AD3224 -- Daalder, Ivo; Lindsay, James M. POWER AND COOPERATION: AN AMERICAN FOREIGN POLICY FOR THE AGE OF GLOBAL POLITICS (Brookings Institution, Web-posted August 14, 2003, 43 pages)
interplay among states, especially the great powers.
Today, world politics is shaped by two unprecedented phenomena that are in some tension with each other.
One is the sheer predominance of the United States.
Today, as never before, what matters most in international politics is how?and whether?Washington acts on any given issue.
The other is globalization, which has unleashed economic, political, and social forces that are beyond the capacity of any one country, including the United States, to control.
American leaders and the American people are now grappling with the double-edged sword that is the age of global politics: how to maximize its rewards while minimizing its dangers.
In this debate, there is little disagreement over whether the United States should be engaged in world affairs.
Both America's extensive global ties and its vulnerability to outside forces make disengagement and isolationism impossible.
Nor is there much disagreement on the purpose of American engagement.
America's interests are best served by a continually expanding liberal international order, one in which increasing numbers of people share the benefits of open markets and democratic governments.
AD3225 -- Audley, John; Perkovich, George; Polaski, Sandra; Vaughan, Scott.
DECODING CANCUN: HARD DECISIONS FOR A DEVELOPMENT ROUND (Carnegie Institute for International Peace, August 2003, 8 pages)
Following the riotous 1999 meeting in Seattle, and a near failure in Doha in 2001, the World Trade Organization dedicated the current round of trade liberalization talks to "development."
Negotiators will meet in Cancun, Mexico, in September amid competing claims regarding what steps are necessary to make trade serve development goals.
The catch phrases of international trade?"comparative advantage," "the development round," "trade not aid," and "level playing field"?hide tough choices for both developing and developed country governments.
Getting trade rules right is not sufficient for development, but getting them wrong can cripple it.
The authors outline the policies that governments and international institutions will need to avoid a debacle at Cancun and to assist developing countries in achieving long-lasting growth.
AD3226 -- CLEARING THE AIR (Surface Transportation Policy Project, August 19, 2003, 68 pages)
Nearly half of all Americans are breathing unhealthy air, and air quality in dozens of metropolitan areas has actually gotten worse over the last decade according to this study report from the Surface Transportation Policy Project.
This report: * Provides an overview of the latest scientific evidence linking poor air quality to public health problems including asthma, cancer, and heart disease; * Determines which populations and places suffer the most from air pollution in the U.S., in addition to analyzing the trends in air pollution over the last decade; * Quantifies the role that transportation plays in the nation's air pollution problems; and * Illustrates the importance of federal laws and federal funding ? in particular the federal Clean Air Act and clean air money available under the federal transportation law ? in reducing the health-related risks from air pollution.
AD3227 -- Moltz, James Clay, ed. NEW CHALLENGES IN MISSILE PROLIFERATION, MISSILE DEFENSE, AND SPACE SECURITY (Monterey Institute of International Studies, Center for Nonproliferation Studies (CNS) and University of Southampton, Mountbatten Centre for International Studies, July 2003, 64 pages)
The materials presented in Occasional Paper No. 12 examine emerging issues, many of which cut across current disciplines.
Dennis Gormley from CNS analyzes the possible terrorist use of unmanned aerial vehicles (UAVs) and cruise missiles, an issue of particular concern given the widespread availability of these systems on the international market.
Drawing on the past experience of the United States, Clayton Chun from the Army War College discusses the technical challenges that states with medium-range missiles will face in trying to develop effective anti-satellite weapons.
His study provides hope that threats to U.S. space assets may not be as serious or as imminent as feared.
Philip Baines, a former aerospace engineer now serving in Canada's Department Foreign Affairs and International Trade, examines prospects for developing so-called "non-offensive" defenses in space as an alternative to space weapons.
In some areas, there are promising new technologies that could make U.S. and other national space assets extremely difficult to locate, track, and attack even by the most sophisticated of weapons (many of which do not yet exist).
Each of these studies breaks new ground and offers considerable food for thought as the United States and other countries seek to understand the true nature of emerging threats and the range of options states might adopt to combat them.
Finally, another topic of increasing importance is the emerging--but uncertain--role of China as a major space power.
[wwwgtop.gif]
August 2003 AD3190 -- DRUG CONTROL: SPECIFIC PERFORMANCE MEASURES AND LONG-TERM COSTS FOR U.S. PROGRAMS IN COLOMBIA HAVE NOT BEEN DEVELOPED (United States General Accounting Office, June 24, 2003, 45 pages)
The United States has been providing assistance to Colombia since the early 1970s to help reduce illegal drug activities.
In fiscal years 2000-03 alone, the United States provided over $2.5 billion.
Despite this assistance, Colombia remains the world's leading producer and distributor of cocaine and a major source of the heroin used in the United States.
The report discusses the status of U.S. counternarcotics assistance to the Colombian Army and for a U.S.-supported Colombian police aerial eradication program.
It also addresses challenges Colombia and the United States face in sustaining these programs.
GAO recommends that the Secretary of State, in consultation with the Secretary of Defense, establish clear objectives, including developing specific performance measures, and estimate future U.S. funding requirements for the programs with the Colombian Army and the Colombian National Police.
AD3191 -- Hufbauer, Gary Clyde; Schott, Jeffrey J. NAFTA DISPUTE SETTLEMENT SYSTEMS (Institute for International Economics, June 2003, 63 pages)
Drawing on the 1989 Canada-US Free Trade Agreement (CUSFTA), the North American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA) extended dispute settlement provisions to cover more ground.
In fact, within NAFTA there are six dispute settlement systems.
NAFTA Chapter 11 is designed to resolve investor-state disputes over property rights; Chapter 14 creates special provisions for handling disputes in the financial sector via the Chapter 20 dispute settlement process (DSP); Chapter 19 establishes a review mechanism to determine whether final antidumping (AD) and countervailing duty (CVD) decisions made in domestic tribunals are consistent with national laws; and Chapter 20 provides government-to-government consultation, at the ministerial level, to resolve high-level disputes.
In addition, the NAFTA partners created interstate dispute mechanisms regarding domestic environmental and labor laws under the North American Agreement on Environmental Cooperation (NAAEC) and the North American Agreement on Labor Cooperation (NAALC), respectively.
This paper, one chapter in a forthcoming book, examines the first four dispute settlement systems; the NAAEC and NAALC systems will be evaluated elsewhere.
AD3192 -- BIOTERRORISM: INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY STRATEGY COULD STRENGTHEN FEDERAL AGENCIES' ABILITIES TO RESPOND TO PUBLIC HEALTH EMERGENCIES (United States General Accounting Office, June 30, 2003, 103 pages)
The October 2001 anthrax attacks, the recent outbreak of the virulent Severe Acute Respiratory Syndrome (SARS), and increased awareness that terrorist groups may be capable of releasing life-threatening biological agents have prompted efforts to improve our nation's preparedness for, and response to, public health emergencies?including bioterrorism.
GAO was asked, among other things, to identify federal agencies' information technology (IT) initiatives to support the nation's readiness to deal with bioterrorism.
The six key federal agencies involved in bioterrorism preparedness and response identified about 70 planned and operational information systems in several IT categories associated with supporting a public health emergency.
These encompass detection (systems that collect and identify potential biological agents from environmental samples), surveillance (systems that facilitate ongoing data collection, analysis, and interpretation of disease-related data), communications (systems that facilitate the secure and timely delivery of information to the relevant responders and decision makers), and supporting technologies (tools or systems that provide information for the other categories of systems).
IT can more effectively facilitate emergency response if standards are developed and implemented that allow systems to be interoperable.
The need for common, agreed-upon standards is widely acknowledged in the health community, and activities to strengthen and increase the use of applicable standards are ongoing.
An underlying challenge for establishing and implementing such standards is the lack of an overall strategy guiding IT development and initiatives.
Without such a strategy to address the development and implementation of standards, agencies may not be well positioned to take advantage of IT that could facilitate better preparation for and response to public health emergencies?including bioterrorism.
AD3193 -- CELEBRATING A NATION OF IMMIGRANTS (United States Department of Homeland Security, Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services, June 30, 2003, 11 pages)
The Department of Homeland Security is sponsoring a weeklong commemoration of the Nation's independence by highlighting the importance of legal immigration and citizenship.
As part of the commemoration, the Department's Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services (BCIS) will welcome approximately 9,500 new Americans at 50 naturalization ceremonies across the United States.
The theme of the ceremonies will be "Celebrating a Nation of Immigrants."
"Welcoming new citizens to the United States is one of the most important things that we do as a nation," Secretary of Homeland Security Tom Ridge said.
"Immigrants invigorate our national spirit and reinforce the ideals and principles that are the foundation of our great nation."
Highlights of the weeklong celebration include: * The kick-off in Philadelphia on July 1.
Secretary Ridge and BCIS Director Eduardo Aguirre, a naturalized citizen, will welcome approximately 1,000 new citizens from nearly 100 countries at a naturalization ceremony at the Community College of Philadelphia; * A naturalization ceremony for 250 members of the armed forces on the deck of the aircraft carrier USS Constellation in San Diego on July 2.
Director Aguirre and DHS Undersecretary Asa Hutchinson will address the new citizens; * On Wednesday, July 2, approximately 200 citizens will take the Oath of Allegiance during a naturalization ceremony to be held in Chicago at the Herald Washington Library.
DHS Undersecretary Michael Brown is the invited speaker for this event.
* The swearing in of 2,700 citizens in three separate ceremonies at the Quiet Cannon Montebello Golf Course in Los Angeles.
Undersecretary Asa Hutchinson is the invited keynote speaker for the July 3 ceremonies; * A naturalization ceremony at Boston's Faneuil Hall, dubbed "The Cradle of Liberty" because it was used by colonists to plan the anti-British tax protests that led to the Revolutionary War.
Director Aguirre will swear in 350 new citizens on July 3; and *A special children's naturalization ceremony at Walt Disney's Epcot Center on July 3.
Fifty children and their parents will attend the ceremony at which DHS Undersecretary Dr. Charles McQueary will join in welcoming the newest Americans.
Disney's famous mouse, Mickey, will be making a special appearance during the ceremony.
AD3194 -- Lynn, Joanne; Adamson, David M. LIVING WELL AT THE END OF LIFE: ADAPTING HEALTH CARE TO SERIOUS CHRONIC ILLNESS IN OLD AGE (RAND, Updated June 24, 2003, 15 printed pages)
Most older Americans now face chronic illness and disability in the final years of life.
These final years can prove painful and difficult for sick and disabled elderly people, who may have difficulty finding care to meet their needs.
This period is often stressful and expensive for families.
As currently configured, health care and community services simply are not organized to meet the needs of the large and growing number of people facing a long period of progressive illness and disability before death.
This white paper synthesizes a growing body of research on the issue of chronic illness in the last phase of life.
It describes the demographic and cost components of the problem, examines gaps in the current health care system, explores some reform measures that are addressing urgent needs, and outlines a vision for adapting the health care system to confront the new reality.
AD3195 -- Carafano, James Jay.
AFTER IRAQ: LEARNING THE WAR'S LESSONS (Heritage Foundation, July 3, 2003, 12 printed pages)
In the wake of the Iraq war, the Bush Administration and Congress are trying to learn what lessons this victory holds for preparing for future conflicts.
There is an expectation that in short order they can digest the war's complex operations and determine sound policy insights.
But that is not likely to happen, according to the author.
Rather, in the near term, he argues, the President and Congress would do well to focus on a few key strategic issues: refining national military strategy; restructuring U.S. alliances; reordering defense research and development priorities; rebalancing aviation acquisition programs; improving post-conflict planning; and enhancing the role of the U.S. Department of Defense in homeland security.
AD3196 -- Murray, Justin.
FY2004 BUDGET: A CHRONOLOGY AND RESOURCE GUIDE WITH INTERNET ACCESS (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, July 3, 2003, 19 pages)
This report provides a select chronology and resource guide concerning congressional and presidential actions and documents pertaining to budget for FY2004, which runs from October 1, 2003 through September 30, 2004.
The budget actions and documents referenced in this report relate to the President's FY2004 budget submission, the FY2004 Congressional Budget Resolution (H.Con.Res 95), reconciliation legislation, debt-limit legislation, and FY2004 appropriation measures.
This report also provides a section entitled "Where Can I Find ... on the Internet?" that includes entries for information via the Internet on appropriations bills, budget background, glossary information, costs estimates, federal debt, and financial statements.
The appendix of this report provides telephone, address, and Internet contact information for resources related to FY2004 budget actions.
AD3197 -- HOMELAND INSECURITY: BUILDING THE EXPERTISE TO DEFEND AMERICA FROM BIOTERRORISM (Partnership for Public Service, July 8, 2003, 36 pages)
This new report is already causing a stir in Congress and in the Department of Homeland Security because it indicates that the federal government's ability to fend off a bioterror attack is in jeopardy due to a shortage of science and medical experts.
The report assesses five key federal biodefense agencies ? the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases, the Food and Drug Administration, the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, and the Food Safety and Inspection Service.
The report is the culmination of a year-long series of interviews and data analysis by Partnership staff with over 30 biodefense experts working both within and outside of these agencies.
"Of all the steps we as a nation must take to protect ourselves from bioterror, a primary antidote is an outstanding and expert federal workforce," said Max Stier, president and CEO of the Partnership for Public Service.
"We need a Manhattan Project-like commitment to our biodefense, seeking out and cultivating the best minds in science and medicine to ensure America's safety."
On July 8, the report's findings were discussed at a press conference featuring U.S. Senator Susan Collins, Chairman of the Senate Governmental Affairs Committee; the Honorable Richard Danzig, former Secretary of the Navy; Dr. Tara O'Toole, director, Johns Hopkins Center for Civilian Biodefense Strategies; and Stier.
AD3198 -- HUMAN DEVELOPMENT REPORT 2003.
MILLENNIUM DEVELOPMENT GOALS: A COMPACT AMONG NATIONS TO END HUMAN POVERTY (United Nations Development Programme, July 8, 2003, 375 pages)
Addressing poverty requires understanding its causes.
This Report adds to that understanding by analyzing the root causes of failed development.
During the 1990s debates about development focused on three sets of issues.
The first was the need for economic reforms to establish macroeconomic stability.
The second was the need for strong institutions and governance?to enforce the rule of law and control corruption.
The third was the need for social justice and involving people in decisions that affect them and their communities and countries?an issue that this Report continues to champion.
These issues are all crucial for sustainable human development, and they continue to deserve priority attention in policy-making.
But they overlook a fourth factor, explored here: the structural constraints that impede economic growth and human development.
The Millennium Development Compact presented in this Report proposes a policy approach to achieving the Millennium Development Goals that starts by addressing these constraints.
AD3199 -- COMMERCIAL PIRACY REPORT 2003 (International Federation of the Phonographic Industry (IFPI), July 10, 2003, 20 pages)
For the first time IFPI has singled out a global top-ten list of priority countries where the need for anti-piracy action by Governments is most pressing.
The top-ten list accounts for different criteria, including a country's pirate sales, the size of its legitimate market, and the trends since 2001.
The priority countries are: Brazil, China, Mexico, Paraguay, Poland, Russia, Spain, Taiwan, Thailand and Ukraine.
Top of the list in terms of its piracy rate is China, where more than 90% of all recordings are pirate, worth over US$530 million, despite the country's accession to the World Trade Organization.
Russia, Brazil and Mexico also stand out among worst-affected markets, with massive sales of pirate music that far exceed their legitimate markets.
Taiwan and Thailand have huge disc manufacturing overcapacity, which fuels CD piracy; Spain is Europe's fastest-growing problem territory; Poland's Warsaw Stadium is a massive illegal black market where enforcement remains weak; Paraguay is the gateway for massive pirate imports and exports for South America; Ukraine remains a priority country with poor enforcement and very high levels of domestic piracy, despite the migration of many CD plants across the border to neighboring Russia.
Outside this top 10 list, many other countries are seeing an increase in either CD-R piracy - small-scale garage or laboratory operations with CD burners stacked in towers - or in manufacturing of discs in CD factories.
In 2002, pirate music sales outnumbered legitimate recordings in no fewer than 25 countries.
AD3200 -- FRESHWATER SUPPLY: STATES' VIEW OF HOW FEDERAL AGENCIES COULD HELP THEM MEET THE CHALLENGES OF EXPECTED SHORTAGES (United States General Accounting Office (GAO), July 10, 2003, 118 pages)
The last comprehensive national water availability and use assessment, completed 25 years ago, identified critical problems, such as shortages and conflicts among users.
Future water availability and use is difficult to predict.
For example, while USDA's 1999 forecast of future water use?not availability?projects a rise in total withdrawals of only 7 percent by 2040, it also warns of the tenuous nature of such projections.
If the most important and uncertain assumptions used in USDA's projection, such as a decrease in irrigated acreage, fail to materialize, water use may be substantially above the estimate.
Current trends indicate that demands on the nation's water resources are growing.
While the nation's capacity for storing surface-water is limited and ground-water is being depleted, demands for freshwater are growing as the population increases, and pressures increase to keep water instream for fisheries, wildlife habitat, recreation, and scenic enjoyment.
For example, ground-water supplies have been significantly depleted in many parts of the country, most notably in the High Plains aquifer underlying eight western states, which in some areas now holds less than half of the water held prior to commencement of ground-water pumping.
Meanwhile, according to Bureau of the Census projections, the southwestern states of California, New Mexico, Arizona, and Nevada, states that are already taxing their current water supplies, are each expected to see their population increase by more than 50 percent from 1995 to 2025.
Furthermore, the potential effects of climate change create additional uncertainty about future water availability and use.
For example, less snow pack as a result of climate change could harm states that rely extensively on melted snow runoff for their freshwater supply.
State water managers expect freshwater shortages in the near future, and their consequences could be severe.
According to the results of GAO's survey, even under normal water conditions, water managers in 36 states anticipate water shortages in localities, regions, or statewide within the next 10 years.
Under drought conditions, 46 managers expect shortages in the next 10 years.
Such shortages may be accompanied by severe economic, environmental, and social impacts.
AD3201 -- THE NATION'S REPORT CARD: WRITING 2002 (U. S. Department of Education, National Center for Education Statistics, July 10, 2003, 248 pages)
The National Assessment of Educational Progress (NAEP) is an ongoing nationally representative sample survey of student achievement in core subject areas.
Authorized by Congress and administered by the National Center for Education Statistics (NCES) within the Institute of Education Sciences of the U.S. Department of Education, NAEP regularly reports to the public on the educational progress of fourth-, eighth-, and twelfth-grade students.
This report presents the results of the NAEP 2002 writing assessment for the nation at grades 4, 8, and 12 and for participating states and other jurisdictions at grades 4 and 8.
Assessment results are described in terms of their average writing score on a 0?300 scale and in terms of the percentage of students attaining each of three achievement levels: Basic, Proficient, and Advanced.
In addition, the report presents percentile distributions and demographic subgroup results for the nation, including results by gender, race/ethnicity, student eligibility for free/reduced-price school lunch, Title I, parents' highest level of education, type of school, and type of school location.
For participating states and jurisdictions, performance results for subgroups defined by gender, race/ethnicity, and student eligibility for free/reduced-price school lunch are presented.
The report also includes sample assessment writing tasks and examples of student responses in narrative, informative, and persuasive writing modes.
Scoring guides for each of the writing modes at grades 4, 8, and 12 as well as rationales for scores of student responses are provided.
Appendices include information on national and state samples, school and student participation rates, participation and accommodation of students with disabilities and/or limited-English-proficient students, subgroup percentages, and state-level contextual variables.
AD3202 -- Hundley, Richard O.; Anderson, Robert H.; Bikson, Tora K.; Neu, Richard.
THE GLOBAL COURSE OF THE INFORMATION REVOLUTION: RECURRING THEMES AND REGIONAL VARIATIONS (RAND, July 16, 2003, 207 pages)
Advances in information technology are heavily influencing ways in which business, society, and government work and function throughout the globe, bringing many changes to everyday life, in a process commonly termed the "information revolution."
This book paints a picture of the state of the information revolution today and how it will likely progress in the near- to mid-term future (10 to 15 years), focusing separately on different regions of the world?North America, Europe, the Asia-Pacific region, Latin America, the Middle East and North Africa, and sub-Saharan Africa.
The ability to acquire and use knowledge will be critical for success in the information society, as knowledge work constitutes an increasing proportion of all work in the long-term future.
Accordingly, developing human capital appropriately is key.
A "quality education for all" will be one of the keys to a nation's success in the information age.
This presents different challenges in different parts of the world.
Globalization, boosted by the information revolution, will continue to have multivalenced social and cultural effects.
While its economic effects are widely recognized, knowledgeable observers also give considerable weight to its societal implications?both positive and negative.
These include further widening of the gap between the political/intellectual/economic elites and others in developing nations, and the globalization of entertainment and, consequently, styles (or at least fads), which leads those in some countries to feel that their own national cultures are being vitiated.
AD3203 -- Ford, Jess T. BORDER SECURITY: NEW POLICIES AND INCREASED INTERAGENCY COORDINATION NEEDED TO IMPROVE VISA PROCESS (United States General Accounting Office (GAO), July 15, 2003, 15 pages)
Since September 11, 2001, visa operations have played an increasingly important role in ensuring the national security of the United States.
The Departments of State, Homeland Security, and Justice, as well as other agencies, are involved in the visa process.
Each plays an important role in making security decisions so that potential terrorists do not enter the country.
In two previous reports, GAO assessed the effectiveness of the visa process as an antiterrorism tool.
GAO made numerous recommendations to strengthen the visa process as an antiterrorism tool.
Among them, GAO recommended that the Department of Homeland Security, in conjunction with the Departments of State and Justice, develop specific policies and procedures for the interagency visa revocation process to ensure that when State revokes a visa because of terrorism concerns, the appropriate units within State, Homeland Security, and the FBI are notified immediately and that proper actions are taken.
State said it is using our recommendations as a roadmap for making improvements in the visa process.
Homeland Security agreed that the visa process should be strengthened as an antiterrorism tool.
AD3204 -- McCarthy, F. Desmond; Bader, William; Pleskovic, Boris.
CREATING PARTNERSHIPS FOR CAPACITY BUILDING IN DEVELOPING COUNTRIES: THE EXPERIENCE OF THE WORLD BANK (World Bank, July 2003, 25 pages)
This paper focuses on one branch of education - economics.
Economics education faces many of its own particular problems.
This paper discuses the experience of a number of countries that introduced Western-style programs.
Many of these efforts were directed to transition countries, but not exclusively so.
The World Bank sought to play a flexible role, sometimes significant, but at other times relatively minor, to facilitate this process.
This report first describes this flexible model and then describes a variety of these experiences.
Most of these efforts have been quite successful and continue to provide additional insights.
The World Bank has participated to a varying degree in a number of institutions specializing in economics education.
This report focuses on nine of these, providing a wide degree of heterogeneity.
These nine institutions include five institutions of higher education offering economics training at the graduate or postgraduate level, and four research networks or centers funding research projects and building linkages between individual researchers and research institutions, primarily in their respective regions.
The training institutions include the following: the Economics Department at the Central European University (CEU) in Budapest; Center for Economic Education and Graduate Research-Economic Institute (CERGE-EI) in Prague; the China Center for Economic Research (CCER) in Beijing; the Economic Education and Research Consortium's M.A. program at the Mohyla Academy (EERC) in Kyiv; the New Economic School (NES) in Moscow.
The four research networks and centers are as follows: the African Economic Research Consortium (AERC) in Nairobi; the Economic Education and Research Consortium (EERC) in Moscow; the Economic Research Forum (ERF) for Arab Countries, Iran and Turkey in Cairo; the Latin American and Caribbean Economic Association (LACEA).
AD3205 -- Westin, Susan S. FOREIGN ASSISTANCE: OBSERVATIONS ON POST-CONFLICT ASSISTANCE IN BOSNIA, KOSOVO, AND AFGHANISTAN (United States General Accounting Office, July 18, 2003, 16 pages)
The circumstances of armed conflicts in Bosnia, Kosovo, and Afghanistan differed in many respects, but in all three cases the United States and the international community became involved in the wars and post-conflict assistance because of important national and international interests.
Over the past 10 years, GAO has done extensive work assessing post-conflict assistance in Bosnia and Kosovo and, more recently, has evaluated such assistance to Afghanistan.
GAO was asked to provide observations on assistance efforts in these countries that may be applicable to ongoing assistance in Iraq.
Specifically, GAO assessed (1) the nature and extent of post-conflict assistance in Bosnia, Kosovo, and Afghanistan; (2) essential components for carrying out assistance effectively; (3) challenges to implementation; and (4) mechanisms used for accountability and oversight.
Humanitarian assistance following armed conflict in Bosnia, Kosovo, and Afghanistan--as well as in Iraq--is part of a broader, long-term assistance effort comprising humanitarian, military, economic, governance, and democracy-building measures.
While the post-conflict situations in these countries have varied, they have certain conditions in common--most notably the volatile and highly politicized environment in which assistance operations take place.
During years of work on post-conflict situations, GAO found that three key components are needed for effective implementation of assistance efforts: a secure environment where humanitarian and other civilian workers are able to perform their tasks; a strategic vision that looks beyond the immediate situation and plans for ongoing efforts; and strong leadership with the authority to direct assistance operations.
GAO also observed a number of challenges to implementing assistance operations, including the need for sustained political and financial commitment, adequate resources, coordinated assistance efforts, and support of the host government and civil society.
Finally, GAO found that the international community and the United States provide a number of mechanisms for accountability in and oversight of assistance operations.
AD3206 -- IMMIGRANTS, FISCAL YEAR 2002 (United States Department of Homeland Security, Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services, July 14, 2003, 46 pages)
This report, which will be included in the forthcoming "2002 Yearbook of Immigration Statistics" (formerly, the Statistical Yearbook of the Immigration and Naturalization Service), is a treasure trove of data on country of origin for immigrants to the U.S.
Although the title says "2002", there are facts and figures on immigration from previous years, with some charts going back as far as 1900.
Among the data highlights are: * The number of immigrants admitted for lawful permanent residence in the United States in 2002 was 1,063,732; * Sixty-three percent of all legal immigrants in fiscal year 2002 were family sponsored, 16 percent were admitted under employment preferences, 12 percent were admitted as refugees or asylees, and 3 percent were admitted under Sections 202 and 203 of the Nicaraguan Adjustment and Central American Relief Act (NACARA) of 1997; * The leading regions of origin of legal immigrants in fiscal year 2002, as in 2001, were North America and Asia.
These regions accounted for 38 percent and 32 percent, respectively, of all legal immigrants in 2002.
[wwwgtop.gif]
July 2003 AD3165 -- Mosher, David E.; Schwartz, Lowell H. et al.
BEYOND THE NUCLEAR SHADOW: A PHASED APPROACH FOR IMPROVING NUCLEAR SAFETY AND U.S-RUSSIAN RELATIONS (RAND, Web-posted May 21, 2003, 223 Pages)
Although U.S.-Russian relations and nuclear postures have improved, the risk of accidental and unauthorized use of nuclear weapons remains a serious problem, exacerbated by Russia's economic problems.
This report presents a phased approach of concrete immediate, near-term, and medium-term steps for improving both nuclear safety and U.S.-Russian relations, which it argues are inextricably linked and need to be addressed together.
AD3166 -- JUSTICE DEPARTMENT OVERSIGHT ANSWERS REGARDING USA PATRIOT ACT AND WAR ON TERRORISM (United States House of Representatives, Committee on the Judiciary, Web-posted May 20, 2003)
On April 1, 2003, the Chairman of the U. S. House Committee on the Judiciary, Representative James Sensenbrenner and Ranking Member John Conyers, responding to concerns about possible civil liberties infringement due to aggressive enforcement of the USA Patriot Act, sent 38 questions to the Attorney General.
The responses from the Justice Department to Representatives Sensenbrenner and Conyers were released on May 20, and include the following points: * Congress did not authorize a new innovation with section 215 (production of tangible records including books, records, papers, documents, etc.).
Grand juries investigating ordinary crimes traditionally have the power to issue subpoenas to all manner of businesses, including libraries and bookstores.
For example, federal grand juries subpoenaed records from numerous libraries during the Unabomber investigation; * Section 212 (which allows computer-service providers to disclose communications and records of communications to protect life and limb) has been used to disclose vital information to law enforcement on many occasions, including one case where such records enabled agents to trace kidnappers' communications; * Section 216 was employed in the investigation of the murder of journalist Daniel Pearl to obtain information that proved critical to identifying some of the perpetrators; * The Government's success in preventing another catastrophic attack on the American homeland in the 20 months since September 11, 2001, would have been much more difficult, if not impossibly so, without the USA PATRIOT Act.
The Department's overall experience is that the authorities Congress provided in the Act have substantially enhanced our ability to prevent, investigate, and prosecute acts of terrorism; * Every single person detained as a material witness as part of the September 11 investigation has been represented by counsel; * The Department has used the new powers of the PATRIOT Act for non-terrorism cases (drug violations, credit card fraud, theft from a bank account, a lawyer who defrauded his clients).
AD3167 -- ASIAN DEVELOPMENT OUTLOOK 2003 (Asian Development Bank, April 29, 2003, 315 pages)
This 15th edition of the Asian Development Outlook provides an analysis of 41 economies in Asia and the Pacific.
It also includes a broad diagnosis of macroeconomic conditions and growth prospects for the region in 2003-2004.
Growth in developing Asia and the Pacific generally improved in 2002.
Expansionary fiscal and accommodative monetary policies contributed to strengthening aggregate demand in many countries while firmer external markets provided a boost to industrial production.
Growth, however, remained below long-term potential in most countries and it was insufficient to substantially raise income and reduce poverty.
The outlook for 2003 is highly vulnerable to the risks of a further weakening in the prospects for industrial countries, volatility in oil prices, and disruptions in tourism and other international markets relating to the conflict in Iraq and the recent outbreak of severe acute respiratory syndrome.
AD3168 -- A COMPREHENSIVE RESOLUTION OF THE KOREAN WAR (United States Institute of Peace, April 2003, 13 printed pages)
Although the Korean War Armistice Agreement stopped the fighting in 1953, it has yet to be replaced by a permanent settlement.
A U.S. initiative to convene, under the auspices of the United Nations Security Council, a four-party conference to craft a political settlement of the Korean conflict, in return for the verified dismantling of North Korea's nuclear weapons and other weapons of mass destruction, would: * Meet the U.S. requirement for a multilateral solution to the nuclear issue; * Address the fundamental source of insecurity for both Koreas (the unresolved state of war); * Likely be supported by our allies and other regional states.
* Leave the United States in a stronger position to deal with North Korea if it refuses a political approach to dismantling its weapons of mass destruction (WMD).
AD3169 -- HUMANITARIAN ASSISTANCE: PROTECTING REFUGEE WOMEN AND GIRLS REMAINS A SIGNIFICANT CHALLENGE (United States General Accounting Office (GAO), May 23, 2003, 63 pages)
Women and children refugees, who comprise 80 percent of the estimated 12 million refugees worldwide, are among the world's most vulnerable populations.
They are subject to gender-based violence, including physical harm, rape, and unequal access to humanitarian assistance.
GAO was asked to: (1) assess efforts by the U.N. High Commissioner for Refugees (UNHCR) to protect refugees, especially with regard to women and girls; (2) determine what steps U.N. and international organizations have taken to prevent sexual exploitation of refugee women by humanitarian workers; and (3) describe U.S. government efforts to support adequate protection for vulnerable populations.
GAO recommends that the Secretary of State work to reform UNHCR's staffing system, expand protection training, encourage protection partnering, and maintain focus on combating sexual exploitation of women and girls.
State agreed with GAO's recommendations.
UNHCR disagreed with fundamentally reforming its staffing system, stating that better instruments for assigning staff and managing vacancies are sufficient remedies.
GAO, however, maintains that UNHCR needs a strategic workforce plan and better staff assignment and rotation policies to ensure that certain vacant duty stations are filled.
AD3170 -- Nowels, Larry.
POPULATION ASSISTANCE AND FAMILY PLANNING PROGRAMS: ISSUES FOR CONGRESS (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, Updated May 19, 2003, 19 pages)
Since 1965, United States policy has supported international population planning based on principles of voluntarism and informed choice that gives participants access to information on all methods of birth control.
This policy, however, has generated contentious debate for over two decades, resulting in frequent clarification and modification of U.S. international family planning programs.
For FY2004 the Administration seeks $425 million in bilateral family planning funds and sets asides $25 million in a reserve account for UNFPA if the organization becomes eligible for U.S. support.
The House International Relations Committee reported legislation (H.R. 1950) on May 16, 2003, authorizing $50 million for UNFPA in FY2004 and FY2005.
The legislation also revises current law in a way that may make it more difficult to deny U.S. contributions to UNFPA.
AD3171 -- Ianchovichina, Elena; Martin, William.
ECONOMIC IMPACTS OF CHINA's ACCESSION TO THE WORLD TRADE ORGANIZATION (World Bank Policy Research Working Paper, World Bank, May 2003, 38 pages)
This paper presents estimates of the impact of accession by China and Chinese Taipei to the WTO.
China is estimated to be the biggest beneficiary, followed by Chinese Taipei and their major trading partners.
Accession will boost the labor-intensive manufacturing sectors in China and especially the textiles and apparel sector that will benefit directly from the removal of quotas on textiles and apparel exports to North America and Western Europe.
Consequently, developing economies competing with China in third markets may suffer relatively small losses.
China has already benefited from the reforms undertaken between 1995 and 2001 (US$31 billion) and trade reforms after accession will lead to additional gains of around $US10 billion.
Accession will have important distributional consequences for China, with wages of skilled workers and unskilled non-farm workers rising in real terms and relative to farm incomes.
Reduction in agricultural protection may hurt some farmers.
AD3172 -- Cossalter, Christian; Pye-Smith, Charlie.
FAST-WOOD FORESTRY: MYTHS AND REALITIES (Center for International Forestry Research (CIFOR), May 2003, 60 pages)
Population growth and a steady increase in the per capita consumption of wood and wood-based products such as paper, especially by urban populations, has led to an increase in the demand for the sort of timber which fast-wood plantations provide.
The international trade in fast-wood products such as wood-fiber panels and paper has also been steadily increasing, and most of the paper produced in countries like Brazil and Chile is now destined for developed country markets.
Rising incomes and population growth, especially in the developing world, have also led to an expansion of arable land and pasture and the loss of vast areas of natural forests.
The fast-wood controversy has set governments, plantation owners and pulp companies against peasant farmers in countries as far apart as Brazil and Indonesia.
It has seen environmental protesters take to the streets in Chile, India, Portugal and Thailand, to name but four of the countries where demonstrations have been particularly volatile.
It has forced development agencies to rethink their policies, and in some countries led to violent clashes between the authorities and local communities.
In short, this has become a major issue, particularly where fast-wood plantations are a significant land use.
This study, with funding from international groups, U.S. government agencies and other nations, is a major review of the findings to date of the controversies surrounding fast-wood forestry.
AD3173 -- Bikson, Tora K.; Treverton, Gregory F.; Moini, Joy; Lindstrom, Gustav.
NEW CHALLENGES FOR INTERNATIONAL LEADERSHIP: LESSONS FROM ORGANIZATIONS WITH GLOBAL MISSIONS (RAND, Web-posted May 28, 2003, 96 pages)
In order for U.S. governmental and non-governmental organizations with international missions to exercise leadership effectively, they need personnel with a multidimensional and well-integrated set of competencies.
There are some between-sector differences in the extent to which particular competencies (e.g., substantive domain knowledge, competitiveness and drive, foreign language fluency versus English language communication skills) are valued, but interviewees for this study (representatives of internationally oriented organizations and experts in the field) agree that international leaders must have an integrated repertoire of skills including: * Substantive depth (professional or technical knowledge) related to the organization's primary business processes; * Managerial ability, with an emphasis on teamwork and interpersonal skills; * Strategic international understanding; * Cross-cultural experience.
Today's senior managers and professionals are nearing retirement, and it is not at all clear that succeeding cohorts have the required competencies for leadership in this changed world.
While the problem has demographic and cohort dimensions that cross sectors, it is most acute in federal agencies; in reference to the public sector workforce, some have called it a "human capital crisis."
AD3174 -- Best, Richard A., Jr.
INTELLIGENCE TO COUNTER TERRORISM: ISSUES FOR CONGRESS (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, Updated May 27, 2003, 22 pages)
The struggle against international terrorism places new and difficult demands on the U.S. Intelligence Community.
Acquiring information about the composition, location, capabilities, plans, and ambitions of terrorist groups is an enormous challenge for intelligence agencies; meeting this challenge requires different skills than were needed to keep informed about the capabilities and intentions of Communist governments.
At the same time, requirements continue for coverage of geopolitical developments around the world and other transnational issues such as narcotics smuggling.
Observers point to several major challenges that the Intelligence Community will likely encounter in supporting the counter terrorist effort:
* First is a renewed emphasis on human agents; * Second, terrorist activities pose significant analytical challenges; * Third is the closer relationship between intelligence and law enforcement agencies; * Finally, military operations against terrorists will reinforce requirements for collecting and transmitting precise intelligence to military commanders or operators through secure communications systems in real time.
AD3175 -- Brown, Harold; Prueher, Joseph W.; Segal, Adam.
CHINESE MILITARY POWER: REPORT OF AN INDEPENDENT TASK FORCE SPONSORED BY THE COUNCIL ON FOREIGN RELATIONS (Council on Foreign Relations (CFR), May 22, 2003, 99 pages)
According to this report, China is pursuing a deliberate course of military modernization, but is at least two decades behind the United States in terms of military technology and capability.
Moreover, if the United States continues to dedicate significant resources to improving its military forces, as expected, the balance between the United States and China, both globally and in Asia, is likely to remain decisively in America's favor beyond the next twenty years.
The report issues a double warning: first, don't overreact to the large-scale modernization program of China's military; second, don't under-react based on the relative backwardness of the People's Liberation Army compared to U.S. military power.
Attributing capabilities to the People's Liberation Army it does not have and will not attain for many years might risk the misallocation of scarce U.S. resources.
Overreaction could lead the United States to adopt policies and undertake actions that become a self-fulfilling prophecy, provoking an otherwise avoidable antagonistic relationship with China that would not serve long-term U.S. interests.
Under-reaction, on the other hand, might allow China someday to catch unaware the United States or its allies in Asia.
AD3176 -- Abramowitz, Morton I.; Laney, James T; Heginbotham, Eric.
MEETING THE NORTH KOREAN NUCLEAR CHALLENGE: REPORT OF AN INDEPENDENT TASK FORCE SPONSORED BY THE COUNCIL ON FOREIGN RELATIONS (Council on Foreign Relations (CFR), May 19, 2003, 54 pages)
Despite some convergence of positions within the allied camp, significant differences remain, limiting the effectiveness of policies adopted by each.
Washington favors a policy of isolation while Seoul pursues one of engagement.
American friends and allies in the region part ways with the United States over how to manage the nuclear crisis and ultimately induce change in the North.
Regional partners fear that the United States will attack North Korean nuclear facilities and unleash war on the peninsula.
All of these states, particularly South Korea and China, tend to oppose anything resembling comprehensive sanctions for fear that an embargo would lead to war as North Korea has threatened.
What the regional partners do agree on is that the United States should seriously negotiate with Pyongyang in hopes of reaching a peaceful resolution to the crisis and, at the very least, test North Korean intentions.
Though desirous of being included in the talks, on balance, they are far less concerned with being involved in multilateral negotiations than they are in ensuring that real negotiations - multilateral or bilateral - take place and that Washington and Pyongyang directly engage.
The United States has not persuaded its regional partners that it is serious about negotiations, making efforts to secure their approval for a significantly tougher position difficult if not impossible.
If negotiations fail or should U.S. intelligence confirm that North Korea has reprocessed its spent fuel, it is uncertain whether our partners would be willing to put significantly greater pressure on North Korea.
AD3177 -- Perkovich, George.
DEALING WITH IRAN's NUCLEAR CHALLENGE (Carnegie Endowment for International Peace, April 28, 2003, 16 pages)
Notwithstanding efforts to block foreign supplies to Iran, U.S. officials and other analysts recognize that Iran may soon achieve sufficient indigenous capacity to develop nuclear weapons without further outside assistance.
Some American officials conclude therefore that nonproliferation has failed and that Iran inevitably will acquire nuclear weapons.
This defeatism is premature, self-fulfilling and irresponsible.
Iran's acquisition of nuclear weapons is inevitable only if past trends continue uninterrupted.
If U.S. officials continue with the policies of the past two decades and simply wait for Iran finally to capitulate to them, then, yes, proliferation is inevitable.
If, alternatively, U.S. officials were willing and able to undertake bold innovations in U.S. policy, Iran could be persuaded to reverse course.
AD3178 -- VIEWS OF A CHANGING WORLD 2003: HOW GLOBAL PUBLICS VIEW THE WAR IN IRAQ, DEMOCRACY, ISLAM AND GOVERNANCE, GLOBALIZATION (Pew Research Center for People and the Press, Web-posted June 3, 2003, 136 pages)
This report documents the principal findings of attitudes towards the U.S. from the latest survey of the Pew Global Attitudes Project, conducted over the past month in 20 countries and the Palestinian Authority.
The speed of the war in Iraq and the prevailing belief that the Iraqi people are better off as a result have modestly improved the image of America.
But in most countries, opinions of the U.S. are markedly lower than they were a year ago.
The war has widened the rift between Americans and Western Europeans, further inflamed the Muslim world, softened support for the war on terrorism, and significantly weakened global public support for the pillars of the post-World War II era ? the U.N. and the North Atlantic alliance.
AD3179 -- Greene, David L.; Schaefer, Andreas.
REDUCING GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS FROM U.S. TRANSPORTATION (Pew Center on Global Climate Change, May 29, 2003, 80 pages)
Transportation sources in the U.S. account for nearly a third of the nation's greenhouse gas (GHG) emissions, and are rising faster than in any other sector.
It is critical that an effective climate change policy for the U.S. address these emissions.
This report identifies a number of policies and technologies that can achieve GHG reductions of the necessary scale.
If we start now with existing technologies and investments, it will be possible to reduce carbon emissions by about 20 percent by 2015, and almost 50 percent by 2030, compared to business as usual.'
Some of the reports recommendations are:
* Fuel economy for new cars and light trucks can be increased by 25-33% over the next 10-15 years using market-ready technologies; * R 
Fuel economy has gotten worse, not because of lack of technology, but lack of policy.
* Fuel cells and hydrogen hold out the tantalizing promise of eliminating GHG emissions from this sector, but government must provide clear policy direction in order to drive massive private investment by the fuel and vehicle industries.
AD3180 -- Palmer, Louann Bierlein; Gau, Rebecca.
CHARTER SCHOOL AUTHORIZING: ARE STATES MAKING THE GRADE? (Thomas B. Fordham Institute, June 5, 2003, 130 pages)
This new report by the Thomas B. Fordham Institute is the first significant study of the organizations that authorize charter schools.
The report examines 23 states and the District of Columbia to determine how supportive they are of charter schools, how good a job their authorizers are doing, and how policy makers could strengthen their states' charter programs.
Fifteen states earned grades of "B-" or better for their authorizers' work, but just four received similar marks for the policy environment in which charter schools and authorizers function.
Massachusetts and Texas led the pack while California, Pennsylvania and New Mexico brought up the rear.
AD3181 -- AMERICA'S LIVING OCEANS: CHARTING A COURSE FOR SEA CHANGE (Pew Oceans Commission, June 4, 2003, 166 pages)
For more than two years, the Commission conducted a national dialogue on ocean issues.
Commission members convened a series of 15 regional meetings, public hearings, and workshops to listen to those who live and work along the coasts, from Maine to Hawaii, Alaska to the Gulf of Mexico.
The fundamental conclusion of the Pew Oceans Commission is that the U.S. needs to ensure healthy, productive, and resilient marine ecosystems for present and future generations.
In the long term, economic sustainability depends on ecological sustainability.
To achieve and maintain healthy ecosystems requires an ethic of stewardship and responsibility toward the oceans.
Most importantly, the government must treat our oceans as a public trust.
The oceans are a vast public domain that is vitally important to our environmental and economic security as a nation.
The public has entrusted the government with the stewardship of our oceans, and the government should exercise its authority with a broad sense of responsibility toward all citizens and their long-term interests.
AD3182 -- Tehan, Rita.
E-COMMERCE STATISTICS: EXPLANATION AND SOURCES (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, June 4, 2003, 15 pages)
The value of e-commerce transactions, while still small relative to the size of the U.S. economy, continues to show strong growth despite a recent economic downturn.
Congress will play a vital role in many e-commerce policy issues, including Internet taxation, encryption and electronic authentication (i.e., digital signatures), intellectual property protection (i.e., patent or copyright infringement), computer network security, and privacy safeguards for individuals and organizations, as well as consideration of how European Union (EU) and World Trade Organization (WTO) policies may affect U.S. e-commerce activities.
This report addresses the complexities of measuring e-commerce growth and provides background information on government and private firms' methods for estimating it.
On the last few pages are web addresses for e-commerce statistics.
AD3183 -- TRAFFICKING IN PERSONS [TIP] REPORT (United States Department of State, June 11, 2003, 177 pages)
The annual trafficking report includes those countries determined to have a significant number of victims of severe forms of trafficking.
The narratives provide an overview of the trafficking situation in the country and the government's efforts to combat trafficking.
The first paragraph of each narrative describes the scope and nature of the trafficking problem in the country, and thus indicates the reasons the country has been included in the report.
The second paragraph indicates the extent of the government's compliance with minimum standards and includes some suggestions for efforts to combat trafficking.
The succeeding paragraphs describe some of the government's efforts to prevent trafficking, prosecute traffickers, and protect victims, and thus illustrate the reasons the country has been placed in Tier 1, 2 or 3 of the report.
The narratives do not include extensive details, comprehensive information about the countries or their governments, or the extent of anti-trafficking activities undertaken by non-governmental entities.
The TIP Report covers the time period of April 2002 through March 2003.
AD3184 -- Jonathan B. Tucker.
PREVENTING THE MISUSE OF PATHOGENS: THE NEED FOR GLOBAL BIOSECURITY STANDARDS (Arms Control Association, June 2003, 11 printed pages)
Negotiating global standards that restrict access to dangerous pathogens would reduce the threat of bioterrorism, while reinforcing the legal prohibitions on the development, production, and stockpiling of biological and toxin weapons contained in the 1972 Biological Weapons Convention (BWC).
Since its inception, the credibility of the BWC has been undermined by its lack of formal mechanisms for monitoring and verification, and efforts over the past decade to strengthen the treaty have been largely unsuccessful.
Since international terrorist organizations are likely to seek biowarfare materials from the most accessible source, international biosecurity standards would reduce the risk that terrorists could obtain dangerous pathogens from foreign laboratories and culture collections.
Harmonized guidelines for transferring pathogens would also facilitate collaborative research and development on biodefense vaccines and drugs.
Joint U.S.-Russian research projects on defenses against anthrax and smallpox, for example, have been hampered by incompatible national regulations on the export of dangerous pathogens.
AD3185 -- Hoffman, Bruce.
AL QAEDA, TRENDS IN TERRORISM AND FUTURE POTENTIALITIES: AN ASSESSMENT (RAND, Web-posted June 19, 2003, 24 pages)
This paper assesses current trends in terrorism and future potentialities.
It examines first the presumed state of al Qaeda today with particular reference to its likely agenda in a post-Iraq war world.
It then more broadly focuses on some key current terrorism trends in order to understand better both how terrorism is changing and what the implications of these changes are in terms of possible future attacks and patterns.
The discussion is organized along four key questions: * What is the state of al-Qa'ida today and what effects have 18 months of unremitting war had on it? * What are the challenges in countering this particular adversary?and, specifically, can al Qa'ida survive bin Laden? * What do some other trends in terrorism today tell us about potential developments in the future? * How should we be thinking about terrorism today and tomorrow?
AD3186 -- Preble, Christopher.
AFTER VICTORY: TOWARD A NEW MILITARY POSTURE IN THE PERSIAN GULF (Cato Institute, June 10, 2003, 15 pages)
The author advocates an ever-decreasing permanent U.S. military presence in the Persian Gulf region.
In addition to the removal of troops from Saudi Arabia, he states that U.S. forces should be withdrawn from other Gulf states, including Qatar, Kuwait, and Iraq, and the U.S. Navy should terminate its long-standing policy of deploying a carrier battle group in the Persian Gulf.
"The United States need not have troops stationed in the Persian Gulf in order to remain engaged in the region.
The Gulf's energy resources are important to the global economy, but goods and services flow on the world market absent explicit "protection" by military forces.
Further, the United States will continue to exert a stabilizing influence from a distance by drawing on its economic assets and its political standing.
In the highly unlikely event that regional conditions threaten vital U.S. security interests, the United States can draw on the military's capacity for projecting force over great distances."
AD3187 -- COMMUNITY ROOTS: SELECTIONS FROM THE LOCAL LEGACIES PROJECT (Library of Congress, The American Folklife Center, Web-posted May 27, 2003, 2 pages)
America is rich with local festivals, community events, and other grassroots activities.
In one way or another, these community gatherings demonstrate Americans' pride of where they come from, who they are, and where they live.
For the online presentation Community Roots, one representative event has been selected for each state, the District of Columbia and the territories and trusts to highlight the many ways that Americans come together and celebrate their communities, heritage, and country.
Fourth of July, Memorial Day, "Loyalty Day," barbeques, rodeos, blues festivals, and parades are some of the community-based events presented.
America is a land of great diversity and this presentation provides a "melting pot" of the many ways Americans celebrate themselves and their country.
The events used for this presentation come from the Library's Local Legacies collection.
Local Legacies collected information from over 1000 community and cultural events, which help capture the "uniqueness of our nation and the pride of its citizens in their heritage."
AD3188 -- Bacchett, Marc; Jansen, Marion.
ADJUSTING TO TRADE LIBERALIZATION - THE ROLE OF POLICY, INSTITUTIONS AND WTO DISCIPLINES (World Trade Organization, Web-posted May 23, 2003, 72 pages)
This study seeks to identify tools at the disposal of governments to smooth adjustment to liberalized trade regimes, to minimize an economy's adjustment costs and to alleviate the burden of those who suffer most.
Some of the salient conclusions from the study are: * Trade liberalization is an agent of economic change, but evidence shows that it does not lead to drastic changes in a country's overall production structure; * Adjustment costs are typically smaller, sometimes much smaller, than the gains from trade; * Governments can identify individuals and groups that may suffer from the adjustment process and they can also develop policies to alleviate the burden falling on those adversely affected; * Governments can adopt policies that influence the size of adjustment costs faced by the economy; * Adjustment costs can be reduced if trade policy reforms are underpinned by international commitments; * The pace of trade reforms can have a beneficial impact on adjustment costs; * The implementation of trade reforms can have a beneficial impact on adjustment costs; * The implementation of trade reforms at a gradual pace may lessen political opposition to change, but the risk of undermining reforms by adopting them too slowly must also be borne in mind; * In many cases effective adjustment to trade liberalization will require the expansion of a country's export sector and this may be an argument for pro-export policies; * WTO agreements seek to provide space for governments to tackle adjustment problems.
AD3189 -- SUPPORTING HUMAN RIGHTS AND DEMOCRACY: THE U.S. RECORD 2002-2003 (United States Department of State, Web-posted June 24, 2003, 194 pages)
This report is submitted to the Congress by the Department of State in compliance with Section 665 of P.L. 107-228, the Fiscal Year 2003 Foreign Relations Authorization Act, which was signed into law on September 30, 2002.
It requires the Department to report on actions taken by the U.S. Government to encourage respect for human rights.
This report is being submitted to Congress for the first time and complements the annual Country Reports on Human Rights Practices for 2002.
Unlike the 196 Country Reports, "Supporting Human Rights and Democracy: The U.S. Record 2002-2003" highlights U.S. efforts to promote human rights and democracy in only 92 countries and entities -- the 92 with the most human rights abuses.
References to Hong Kong, Macau and Tibet have been incorporated into the China report, and Western Sahara is mentioned in the Morocco report.
Due to the rapidly evolving situation in Iraq, this report does not include that country.
[wwwgtop.gif]
June 2003 AD3139 -- A BREATH OF FRESH AIR: REVIVING THE NEW SOURCE REVIEW PROGRAM (National Academy of Public Administration, April 21, 2003, 202 pages)
In this report commissioned by Congress, a panel of the National Academy of Public Administration recommends that the oldest and dirtiest coal-fired industrial facilities be given a firm deadline to install cleaner equipment or close down.
The panel, critical of the Bush Administration's efforts to weaken clean air enforcement rules, further recommends that Congress continue requiring NSR permits for new plants, but also replace NSR as it applies to existing facilities with a simpler, more effective, performance-based program.
The New Source Review program (NSR) is a critical tool enacted by Congress 25 years ago to protect public health and improve the nation's air quality.
But, as applied to existing facilities, NSR is not working as Congress intended.
Thus NSR should be fundamentally reformed and strongly enforced against past violations by existing facilities.
AD3140 -- INFORMATION ON NATIONAL EXPERIENCES WITH THE INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY PROTECTION OF TRADITIONAL KNOWLEDGE (Intergovernmental Committee on Intellectual Property and Genetic Resources, Traditional Knowledge and Folklore,World Intellectual Property Organization (WIPO), April 4, 2003, 98 pages)
In preparation for the fifth session of The Intergovernmental Committee on Intellectual Property and Genetic Resources, Traditional Knowledge and Folklore ("the Committee"), to be held in Geneva from July 7 to 15, 2003, member countries were asked to participate in surveys of national experience with the intellectual property protection of traditional knowledge.
The basic question posed to countries was: "Please explain by means of concrete examples how currently available standards of intellectual property have been used to protect traditional knowledge."
Responses are provided from the following Member States: Australia, Canada, Colombia, Costa Rica, France, Italy, Kazakhstan, Mexico, Republic of Moldova, New Zealand, Portugal, Russian Federation, Samao, Venezuela, and Vietnam.
AD3141 -- CONSIDERATIONS FOR THE MANAGEMENT OF OIL IN IRAQ: A HUMAN RIGHTS WATCH BACKGROUND BRIEFING (Human Rights Watch, April 2003, 5 pages)
In this report Human Rights Watch maintains that oil revenues should be directed first to meeting the humanitarian needs of Iraq's people.
Prior to the war, approximately 60 percent of Iraqi families received their sole sustenance from the Oil-for-Food program.
Because of the conflict and the initial suspension of the Oil-for-Food program, humanitarian needs will increase substantially.
Another pressing issue is who should manage the oil.
Any reversion to foreign control, or the appearance of foreign control, in the aftermath of U.S.-led military intervention will likely be a major issue of contention and popular opposition.
AD3142 -- Johnson, Stephen; Dale, Helle.
HOW TO REINVIGORATE U.S. PUBLIC DIPLOMACY (Heritage Organization, April 23, 2003, 18 printed pages)
According to the authors, the United States government is losing its voice before foreign audiences and needs to get it back.
The U.S. Information Agency (USIA) and international broadcasting efforts such as the Voice of America (VOA) - influential in articulating U.S. positions and providing a basis for cross-cultural understanding for the past 50 years - have been neglected since the end of the Cold War.
While most Americans may not know the term public diplomacy, the events of September 11 have made them aware that Uncle Sam's global image is in serious trouble.
To reverse America's declining image abroad, both public diplomacy and related international broadcasting agencies need a clear chain of command as well as adequate personnel and financial resources.
In addition, public diplomacy programs that once helped nurture positive long-term relations with foreign publics and opinion leaders must be restored.
AD3143 -- Eddy, Mark.
WAR ON DRUGS: LEGISLATION IN THE 108TH CONGRESS AND RELATED DEVELOPMENTS (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, Updated April 16, 2003, 18 pages)
Drug abuse is a problem in the United States due to its economic cost, estimated to have been over $160 billion in 2000.
This sum includes lost productivity, health care costs, and criminal justice expenditures.
An estimated 1.6 million people were arrested in the United States in 2001 for drug abuse violations.
In recent years, Congress has taken an increasingly punitive stance toward drug addicts and casual users alike.
A different approach has been taken by certain countries in Europe and elsewhere that are experimenting with less restrictive policies such as decriminalization and "harm reduction" programs.
The 108th Congress will receive strong encouragement from the Executive Branch to continue on its current path.
AD3144 -- Aslund, Anders; Warner, Andrew.
THE ENLARGEMENT OF THE EUROPEAN UNION: CONSEQUENCES FOR THE CIS COUNTRIES (Carnegie Endowment for International Peace, April, 2003, 28 pages)
Within a few years, ten former communist countries are supposed to become members of the European Union (EU).
The question immediately arises what this enlargement of the EU will mean to the twelve former Soviet countries of the Commonwealth of Independent States (CIS).
The effects will be many and multifaceted, both qualitative and quantitative.
This paper deals with the impact of the current EU enlargement on the CIS countries.
The authors discuss the major issues, namely GDP growth, trade, financial flows, migration, and the impact on the overall economic system.
AD3145 -- MANUAL ON COUNTERING MONEY LAUNDERING AND THE FINANCING OF TERRORISM (Asian Development Bank (ADB), January 2003, Web-posted March 2003, 525 pages)
The information and materials compiled in this manual provide guidance to decisionmakers on: * the basic facts of money laundering; * the negative economic effects of money laundering on economic development; * the international conventions and standards that have established legal obligations or benchmarks for combating money laundering and the financing of terrorism; * samples of prevention guidelines for financial institutions; and * selected models of laws or regulations on combating money laundering and the financing of terrorism.
This publication brings together in one place a number of conventions, principles, recommendations, guidelines, model laws, etc., related to anti-money laundering activities.
Although developed primarily for Asian economies, there are examples from, and for, other regions.
AD3146 -- WORLD'S WORST PLACES TO BE A JOURNALIST (Committee to Protect Journalists (CPJ), Web-posted May 3, 2003, 5 printed pages)
The Committee to Protect Journalists marked World Press Freedom Day, Saturday, May 3, by naming the World's Worst Places to Be a Journalist.
The list of 10 places represents the full range of current threats to press freedom.
At the top of the list is Iraq, where nine journalists covering the U.S.-led war there were killed in action during the first three weeks of hostilities, falling victim to Iraqi or U.S. fire, land mines, or suicide bombers.
Four other journalists in Iraq died in accidents or from illness.
A brutal crackdown launched in Cuba by Fidel Castro's government put an unprecedented 28 journalists behind bars in March, and they are serving lengthy prison terms of up to 27 years.
During the last year, independent journalists in Vietnam who dared to criticize the ruling Communist Party in print or on the Internet were harassed, placed under heavy surveillance, or thrown in jail.
CPJ also placed Afghanistan, Chechnya, the West Bank and Gaza, Eritrea, Togo, Colombia, and Belarus on the list of Worst Places to Be a Journalist.
AD3147 -- Pinkston, Daniel A. SOUTH KOREAN ELECTORAL POLITICS AND SEOUL'S POSITION ON THE NORTH KOREAN NUCLEAR CRISIS (Center for Nonproliferation Studies, Monterey Institute of International Studies, April 25, 2003, 8 pages)
During trilateral talks in Beijing 23-25 April 2003, North Korean Deputy Foreign Minister Li Gun reportedly told U.S. Assistant Secretary for East Asian and Pacific Affairs James Kelly that North Korea possesses nuclear weapons.
Li also reportedly said that Pyongyang is prepared to produce more weapons or export them, depending on U.S. actions.
The Bush administration now faces an extremely difficult security problem that will require close coordination with key regional countries, particularly South Korea and China.
As Washington moves forward with policies to deal with Pyongyang's nuclear program, a clear understanding of South Korean government policies and domestic constraints will be necessary to maintain close cooperation with Seoul.
South Korean President Roh Moo Hyun has only been in office two months, so his approach to dealing with North Korea is still emerging as the nuclear crisis unfolds.
The president has extensive foreign policy and national security powers within the South Korean system of government.
Therefore, many were anxious to learn how the South Korean government's position on the North Korean nuclear program might shift following the election of Millennium Democratic Party (MDP) candidate Roh on 19 December 2002.
In particular, many were concerned that Roh's election and anti-American sentiments expressed during the campaign might signal a coming rift in the U.S.-South Korean alliance.
AD3148 -- GLOBAL HEALTH: GLOBAL FUND TO FIGHT AIDS, TB AND MALARIA HAS ADVANCED IN KEY AREAS, BUT DIFFICULT CHALLENGES REMAIN (United States General Accounting Office, May 7, 2003, 75 pages)
By the end of 2002, more than 40 million people worldwide were living with human immunodeficiency virus/acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (HIV/AIDS), with 5 million newly infected that year.
HIV/AIDS, along with tuberculosis (TB) and malaria, causes nearly 6 million deaths per year and untold human suffering.
Established in January 2002, the Global Fund (the Fund) aims to rapidly disburse grants to augment existing spending on the prevention and treatment of these three diseases while maintaining sufficient oversight of financial transactions and program effectiveness.
As of April 1, 2003, the United States had pledged $1.65 billion to the Fund and is expected to remain its single largest donor.
In this study, GAO was asked to assess: (1) the Fund's progress in developing governance structures; (2) the systems that the Fund has developed for ensuring financial accountability, monitoring and evaluating grant projects, and procuring goods and services; (3) the Fund's efforts to raise money; and (4) its grant-making process.
AD3149 -- Gilroy, Angele A.; Kruger, Lennard G. BROADBAND INTERNET ACCESS: BACKGROUND AND ISSUES (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, Updated May 5, 2003, 17 pages)
Broadband or high-speed Internet access is provided by a series of technologies that give users the ability to send and receive data at volumes and speeds far greater than current Internet access over traditional telephone lines.
Currently, a number of telecommunications companies are developing, installing, and marketing specific technologies and services to provide broadband access to the home.
Meanwhile, the federal government - through Congress and the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) - is seeking to ensure fair competition among the players so that broadband will be available and affordable in a timely manner to all Americans who want it.
Broadband access, along with the content and services it might enable, has the potential to transform the Internet - both what it offers and how it is used.
For example, a two-way high speed connection could be used for interactive applications such as online classrooms, showrooms, or health clinics, where teacher and student (or customer and salesperson, doctor and patient) can see and hear each other through their computers.
An "always on" connection could be used to monitor home security, home automation, or even patient health remotely through the Web.
The high speed and high volume that broadband offers could also be used for bundled service where, for example, cable television, video on demand, voice, data, and other services are all offered over a single line.
In truth, it is possible that many of the applications that will best exploit the technological capabilities of broadband, while also capturing the imagination of consumers, have yet to be developed.
AD3150 -- Perl, Raphael.
NEW HOPE FOR PREVENTING CHILD ABUSE AND NEGLECT: PROVEN SOLUTIONS TO SAVE LIVES AND PREVENT FUTURE CRIME (Fight Crime: Invest in Kids, May 5, 2003, 34 pages)
This report was prepared by Fight Crime: Invest in Kids, a national, bipartisan, non-profit, anti-crime organization of more than 2,000 police chiefs, sheriffs, prosecutors and victims of violence.
It was released at a news conference on Capitol Hill.
The report shows that the number of cases of abuse and neglect in America far exceeds the 900,000 confirmed cases and 1,300 deaths reported to the government annually.
The real toll is an estimated 2.7 million cases of abuse and neglect, and at least 2,000 children killed each year.
Research in the report illustrates ways in which child abuse and neglect can be prevented.
Among the research cited are studies of: * The Chicago Child-Parent Centers, a pre-kindergarten program for three and four-year-olds with a strong parent involvement component.
A long-term study showed that child abuse and neglect was cut in half in families that participated in the program compared to similar at-risk families that did not participate; * The Nurse Family Partnership, which randomly assigned at-risk mothers in Elmira, NY to receive home visits by nurses providing coaching in parenting and other skills.
A rigorous study showed that there were 80 percent fewer incidents of child abuse among families in the program, compared to those not enrolled.
Children from families not in the program had twice as many arrests by the time they were 15 compared to children whose mothers received coaching.
AD3151 -- Cordesman, Anthony H. THE MILITARY BALANCE IN THE MIDDLE EAST: AN ANALYTICAL OVERVIEW.
MILITARY EXPENDITURES AND ARMS TRANSFERS, MAJOR ARMS BY COUNTRY AND ZONE, AND QUALITATIVE TRENDS (Center for Strategic and International Studies (CSIS), Updated and Web-posted May 9, 2003, 253 pages)
In this report, the author offers a detailed "net assessment" of Middle Eastern military efforts and forces.
The report combines data on the trends in defense efforts, spending, procurement, R
This detailed overview also examines the effects and implications of modern warfare on effective and perceived military strengths as well as arms purchases.
Finally, the report examines issues associated with the proliferation of weapons of mass destruction in an environment that increasingly favors asymmetric warfare.
AD3152 -- Cordesman, Anthony H. WEAPONS OF MASS DESTRUCTION IN THE MIDDLE EAST: REGIONAL TRENDS, NATIONAL FORCES, WARFIGHTING CAPABILITIES, DELIVERY OPTIONS, AND WEAPONS EFFECTS (Center for Strategic and International Studies (CSIS), May 9, 2003, 162 pages)
Cordesman provides a detailed, 160-page description of the trends in proliferation, including long-range missiles, chemical, biological, radiological and nuclear forces, and their impact on the regional military balance and arms control.
It includes detailed descriptions of the delivery systems, and chemical, biological, radiological, and nuclear force developments in Algeria, Libya, Egypt, Israel, Syria, Iran and Iraq, the Sudan.
This report also examines the reasons that states pursue non-conventional armaments, as well as the instabilities created by such efforts.
The specific weapons themselves are also discussed in detail, creating thorough background necessary to understand fully the threats that WMD pose to peace.
These inspections of both proliferation efforts and the effects of WMD are tied together in an appraisal of how and why states and non-state actors pursue and may, someday, use WMD in this increasingly volatile region.
AD3153 -- Parachini, John; Davis, Lynn; Liston, Timothy.
HOMELAND SECURITY: A COMPENDIUM OF PUBLIC AND PRIVATE ORGANIZATIONS' POLICY RECOMMENDATIONS (RAND, May 8, 2003, 64 pages)
In the aftermath of the September 11 terrorist attacks, President George W. Bush undertook major changes in the way the Executive Branch is organized in order to better deal with the various aspects of homeland security.
He first created within the White House an Office of Homeland Security, headed by the Assistant to the President for Homeland Security.
The president also established a new interagency coordinating body, the Homeland Security Council.
In June 2002, he went on to propose a new Department of Homeland Security with four divisions: Border and Transportation Security; Emergency Preparedness and Response; Chemical, Biological, Radiological, and Nuclear Countermeasures; and Information Analysis and Infrastructure Protection.
The U.S. Congress, in legislating the establishment of the new department, endorsed most of the president's proposals, with only some refinements.
As the Department of Homeland Security assumes its responsibilities, the past findings of various organizations can offer important guidance to the new department.
This paper presents various advisory groups' major recommendations on strategic and substantive policy issues, which have not yet been adopted by the Bush Administration but that we feel warrant additional examination.
This paper uses as its framework the six critical mission areas and four foundations of homeland security, as defined in President Bush's National Strategy for Homeland Security.
The critical mission areas are intelligence and warning, border and transportation security, domestic counterterrorism emergency preparedness and response, protecting critical infrastructures and key assets, defending against catastrophic threats, and emergency preparedness and response (the authors address all but the last mission area in this paper).
The four foundations are the law, science and technology, information sharing and systems, and international cooperation (again, the authors address all but the last foundation).
Also included in the national strategy is a statement of basic principles to guide the allocation of funding for homeland security and a statement of priorities for the future of U.S. counterterrorism activities.
AD3154 -- Wyszomirski, Margaret.
INTERNATIONAL CULTURAL RELATIONS: A MULTI-COUNTRY COMPARISON (Center for Arts and Culture, April 2003, Web-posted May 7, 2003, 67 pages)
Compared with the United States, a number of other countries have been engaged in exchanges and cultural diplomacy for longer and with less ambiguity.
For example, French cultural diplomacy dates back to the nineteenth century.
Countries like France and Germany also regard their culture and language as a valuable public good that they believe should be treated as a potential global public good.
Some countries not only feel comfortable enlisting culture, education, and language in the promotion of the nation's international interests, but consider them integral to the image and character of the country itself.
This review of the cultural diplomacy practices of other countries should prove informative and suggestive when compared to those of the United States.
This comparison focuses on cultural diplomacy philosophy, priorities, programs, structure, funding, and scale of operations of nine countries.
These nine countries (in alphabetical order) are Australia, Austria, France, Canada, Japan, Netherlands, Singapore, Sweden, and the United Kingdom.
While not a representative group, these are, nonetheless, a diverse and important group of countries.
The nine countries include those with well-established and extensive cultural diplomacy programs.
Small and large countries are included.
Geographic diversity spans North American, European, and Pacific regions.
Many are allies of the United States and/or significant trading partners.
All have been affected by the end of the Cold War era and by increasing global interdependence.
Many have revamped aspects of their cultural diplomacy in the past decade.
AD3155 -- FREE TRADE AREA OF THE AMERICAS: UNITED STATES FACES CHALLENGES AS CO-CHAIR OF FINAL NEGOTIATING PHASE AND HOST OF NOVEMBER 2003 MINISTERIAL (Testimony Before the Subcommittee on International Trade, Committee on Finance, U.S. Senate, May 13, 2003, 17 pages)
The United States faces several challenges as co-chair of the final phase of Free Trade Area of the Americas negotiations.
First, USTR, which is responsible for co-chairing these negotiations and hosting the November 2003 ministerial, has not added appreciably to its staff, despite the sharply increased workload.
Second, the goals of this phase - such as achieving improved market access for the 34 nations - are ambitious and will require serious, substantive trade-offs.
Finally, the negotiations are proceeding on the same timeline as several other complex trade negotiations involving the United States.
In fact, the resolution of a key issue, agricultural subsidies, has been linked to ongoing negotiations in the World Trade Organization.
The Office of the U.S. Trade Representative (USTR) should intensify U.S. preparations and regularly evaluate whether resources and plans are sufficient to carry out the tasks and mitigate the risks associated with its responsibilities as co-chair of the negotiations and host of the November ministerial.
These are related to USTR's (1) increased workload, (2) planning for the ministerial, (3) funding sources, and (4) security needs at the ministerial.
AD3156 -- Albright, Madeleine et al.
JOINT DECLARATION: RENEWING THE TRANSATLANTIC PARTNERSHIP (Center for Strategic and International Studies (CSIS), May 14, 2003, 4 pages)
According to the distinguished panel listed above, "there seems to be a view among many in the United States and in a number of countries in Europe that "maybe" we no longer need the partnership after all.
The conditions that have allowed this sentiment to emerge and grow must be addressed and overcome.
In short, whatever ground there may be for exasperation on both sides of the Atlantic, no disagreement should be allowed to disrupt our relations with our European allies.
The issue is not one of U.S. membership in the European Union or any of its distinctive institutional bodies, but one of association, dialogue, and cooperation before decisions are reached.
At some point over the next five years, a mechanism should be adopted that allows more direct consultation between the United States and the institutional bodies of the EU.
The current format of U.S.- EU summit meetings does not satisfy that need.
Europe should leave no doubt about its intention to build with its partner across the Atlantic the same intimacy that the United States built with the states of Europe within NATO."
AD3157 -- ACCESS TO HIV PREVENTION: CLOSING THE GAP (Global HIV Prevention Working Group, May 13, 2003, 48 pages)
The Global HIV Prevention Working Group is composed of nearly 40 leaders in public health, clinical care, biomedical, behavioral, and social research, and people affected by HIV/AIDS from around the world.
It was convened in 2002 by the Bill 
The report identifies key prevention priorities in each region: * Sub-Saharan Africa: Prevention programs for youth and for adults at greatest risk are urgently needed, and mother-to-child transmission programs should be dramatically expanded.
* Asia and the Pacific: The diverse epidemics of Asia require expansion of a broad range of approaches, including behavior-change programs targeted at high-risk groups such as sex workers and men who have sex with men, new efforts to curb rising STD rates, harm reduction programs for injection drug users, and interventions to address the gender inequities that often drive the epidemic.
* Eastern Europe and Central Asia: Because the rapidly spreading epidemic in this region is driven by injecting drug use, harm reduction, including needle and syringe programs, is essential to prevent HIV from spreading to the broader population.
* North Africa and the Middle East: Programs in this region should target high-risk populations, including injecting drug users, sex workers, and men who have sex with men.
AD3158 -- Hachigian, Nina; Wu, Lily.
THE INFORMATION REVOLUTION IN ASIA (RAND, May 13, 2003, 125 pages)
This report discusses the information revolution in the Asia-Pacific region and its likely course over the next five to ten years.
Key questions addressed in this report include the extent to which the information revolution has taken hold of markets in this region, the political implications of the information revolution for Asian governments, the variations between individual countries, and the prospects for further information-technology-related developments in the region.
AD3159 -- Bandow, Doug.
BRING THE TROOPS HOME: ENDING THE OBSOLETE KOREAN COMMITMENT (Cato Institute, May 7, 2003, 20 pages)
According to the author, the U.S. alliance with the Republic of Korea "has been America's most consistently dangerous commitment since the end of World War II.
Yet South Korea is beginning to look away from the United States for its defense.
Newly elected President Roh Moo-hyun campaigned on a plat-form of revisiting the security relationship, and he has attempted to adopt the role of mediator between America and North Korea.
Recently attention has been focused on events in North Korea, but the North Korean nuclear controversy must be considered within the context of the U.S.-ROK security relationship.
The future of America's relations with South Korea is complicated by Washington's unnatural military presence on the Korean peninsula, and no solution is likely until that unnatural presence is removed.
The 37,000 U.S. troops in the South are a Cold War artifact, and the U.S.-ROK alliance - once considered valuable - must be reconsidered.
It is time to restructure that relationship, and the United States and the ROK should begin planning for removal of all American forces from the Korean peninsula."
AD3160 -- Katzman, Kenneth.
IRAQ: OIL-FOR-FOOD PROGRAM, INTERNATIONAL SANCTIONS, AND ILLICIT TRADE (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, Updated April 16, 2003, 24 pages)
The "oil-for-food" program has been the centerpiece of a long-standing U.N. Security Council effort to alleviate human suffering in Iraq while maintaining key elements of the Gulf war-related sanctions regime.
In order to ensure that Iraq remains contained and that only humanitarian needs are served by the program, U.N. Security Council resolutions have mandated substantial controls on Iraqi oil exports and humanitarian imports.
The program had been suspended on the eve of the March 17, 2003 start of hostilities against Iraq.
U.N. Security Council Resolution 1472, adopted March 28, 2003, restarts and adjusts the program to enable it to serve as a vehicle to provide humanitarian relief for the wartime period and lays the groundwork to continue the program into the post-war period.
[Note: Resolution 1476, approved on May 8, 2003, continues the program until June 3, 2003; before that June date, the Security Council must decide whether to continue the program.]
AD3161 -- Nordhaus, Robert R; Danish, Kyle.
DESIGNING A MANDATORY GREENHOUSE GAS REDUCTION PROGRAM FOR THE U.S. (Pew Center on Global Climate Change, May 15, 2003, 78 pages)
This report examines options for designing a domestic greenhouse gas reduction program.
In addition to cap-and-trade programs, this report evaluates greenhouse gas taxes and a "sectoral hybrid" program that combines efficiency standards for automobiles and consumer products with a cap-and-trade program applicable to large sources of greenhouse gases.
Each option is evaluated according to the following criteria: environmental effectiveness, cost-effectiveness, administrative feasibility, distributional equity, and political acceptability.
The report's analysis suggests that the comprehensive, upstream cap-and-trade (or similar) approach and the sectoral hybrid approach are the most viable alternatives for a domestic program.
AD3162 -- Ellerman, Denny et al.
EMISSIONS TRADING IN THE U.S.: EXPERIENCE, LESSONS AND CONSIDERATIONS FOR GREENHOUSE GASES (Pew Center on Global Climate Change, May 15, 2003, 72 pages)
In recent years, emissions trading has become an important element of programs to control air pollution.
Experience indicates that an emissions trading program, if designed and implemented effectively, can achieve environmental goals faster and at lower costs than traditional command-and-control alternatives.
Under such a program, emissions are capped but sources have the flexibility to find and apply the lowest-cost methods for reducing pollution.
A cap-and-trade program is especially attractive for controlling global pollutants such as greenhouse gases because their warming effects are the same regardless of where they are emitted, the costs of reducing emissions vary widely by source, and the cap ensures that the environmental goal is attained.
Emissions trading has achieved prominence beyond the United States largely in the context of discussions regarding implementation of the Kyoto Protocol, a proposed international agreement to control emissions of carbon dioxide (CO2) and other greenhouse gases.
The Kyoto Protocol provides for the use of various emissions trading mechanisms at the international level.
Some countries already are developing emissions trading programs while the process of ratifying the Protocol moves forward.
Both the United Kingdom and Denmark have instituted greenhouse gas (GHG) emissions trading programs, and, in December 2002, the European environment ministers agreed on the ground rules for a European Union trading program that would begin in 2005 for large sources of CO2 emissions (and later for other GHG emissions).
Proposals to control GHG emissions in the United States also include the use of emissions trading.
AD3163 -- Ahearn, Raymond J. U.S. - EUROPEAN UNION TRADE RELATIONS: ISSUES AND POLICY CHALLENGES (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, Updated May 12, 2003, 19 pages)
The United States and European Union have a full plate of high profile bilateral disputes this year.
Several of the disputes may need to be resolved and new potential disputes avoided if the bilateral trade strains are to be contained and a smoother trade relationship is to develop.
Moreover, progress on the bilateral front could provide a foundation for the two trading giants to make progress in efforts to begin the process of multilateral trade negotiations as prescribed by the Doha Ministerial Declaration.
Resolution of disputes over steel, the U.S. export tax subsidy, and the EU ban on imports of genetically modified organisms (GMOs) are at the top of the list of bilateral challenges.
AD3164 -- REPORT TO CONGRESS: STATUS OF FISHERIES OF U.S. 2002 (United States Department of Commerce, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA), National Marine Fisheries Service, Office of Sustainable Fisheries, Web-posted May 13, 2003, 41 pages)
In accordance with the Sustainable Fisheries Act of 1996, NOAA's National Marine Fisheries Service compiles an annual report on the stocks of hundreds of species in U. S. fisheries.
Among the findings regarding fish stocks in this year's report, there are: * 932 Federally managed stocks * 259 Major stocks (200,000 + pounds in landings) * 673 Minor stocks (under 200,000 pounds in landings) * 695 Status unknown or not defined * 86 Overfished stocks * 1 Stock approaching an overfished condition * 66 Stocks subject to overfishing * 70 Rebuilding programs in place * The 259 major fish stocks in the United States account for 99.9 percent of total landings, totaling 9 billion pounds.
As NOAA admits in a recent press release, The Status of Stocks report has been "the subject of a considerable amount of criticism from marine advocacy groups in the past due to the number of species not routinely assessed, and therefore not labeled with a status determination.
While all marine life is valuable in an ecosystem context, science and management funding is prioritized to address those fisheries under the most harvesting pressure.
NOAA Fisheries has undertaken an aggressive plan of action to improve its ability to assess more of the 673 fish stocks whose status is labeled unknown in this report, and to strengthen existing data collection and assessment programs.
The agency is in the process of implementing its Marine Fisheries Stock Assessment Improvement Plan, which calls for multiyear increases in staffing and budget to upgrade the agency's stock assessment capabilities.
May 2003 AD3116 -- Katzman, Kenneth.
IRAQ: U.S. REGIME CHANGE EFFORTS AND THE IRAQI OPPOSITION (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, Updated March 17, 2003, 22 pages)
Since February 2003, the Administration has stressed that regime change through U.S.-led military action would yield benefits beyond disarmament, including liberation from an oppressive regime for the Iraqi people and enhancement of the prospects for peace and democracy throughout the Middle East.
The goal of regime change in Iraq has been declared U.S. policy since November 1998.
Even before then, U.S. efforts to oust Saddam had been pursued, with varying degrees of intensity, since the end of the Gulf war in 1991.
These efforts primarily involved U.S. backing for opposition groups inside and outside Iraq, some of which are now receiving increased U.S. political and financial support and military training.
According to several experts, past efforts to change the regime floundered because of limited U.S. commitment, disorganization of the Iraqi opposition, and the efficiency and ruthlessness of Iraq's several overlapping intelligence and security forces.
Currently, Iraq's exiled opposition are stepping up their coordination, and in some cases their military preparations, to be in position to benefit politically from the collapse of the regime that is expected to result from U.S. military action.
Previous U.S. administrations ruled out major U.S. military action to change Iraq's regime, believing such action would be costly, risky, and not necessarily justified by the level of Iraq's lack of compliance on WMD disarmament.
Opponents of military action maintain that there is insufficient international support for unilateral U.S. military action to change Iraq's regime, that doing so could destabilize the Middle East and hinder the broader war on terrorism, and that action could lead to numerous U.S. casualties and a long-term presence in Iraq which could subject U.S. occupation forces to years of attacks by feuding Iraqi factions and remnants of Iraq's military.
Others believe that the threat from Saddam's regime is manageable through means currently in place, such as containment, especially now that Iraq is allowing access to all sites by U.N. weapons inspectors.
Countries that oppose the U.S. position cite briefings from chief U.N. weapons inspector Hans Blix to argue that the inspections process is working and could result in disarmament of Iraq, without war.
AD3117 -- Schmidley, Dianne.
THE FOREIGN-BORN POPULATION IN THE UNITED STATES: MARCH 2002 (U. S. Census Bureau, February 2003, 8 pages)
This annual snapshot of the numbers and make-up of the foreign-born population includes some important facts, including: * Among the foreign-born population, 52 percent were born in Latin America, 26 percent in Asia, 14 percent in Europe and the remaining 8 percent in other regions of the world, such as Africa and Oceania; * People from Central America and Mexico made up more than two-thirds of the foreign-born from Latin America.
They were concentrated in the West (55 percent) and the South (30 percent); * Among the foreign-born in 2002, nearly half had entered the United States since 1990.
More than 1-in-3 foreign-born people were naturalized U.S. citizens.
AD3118 -- 2003 TRADE POLICY AGENDA AND 2002 ANNUAL REPORT (Office of the United States Trade Representative (USTR), March 3, 2003, 371 pages)
A key achievement this past year was the renewal of the Executive-Congressional partnership embodied in Trade Promotion Authority (TPA).
With that authority restored after a lapse of eight years, the Administration has begun to fulfill the vision of open markets and development articulated at the launch of new global trade negotiations in Doha, Qatar, in 2001.
The United States has submitted far-reaching proposals to the World Trade Organization (WTO), including plans to remove all tariffs on manufactured goods, open agriculture and services markets, and address the special needs of poorer developing countries.
Working closely with the Congress, the Administration capped the year by completing Free Trade Agreement (FTA) negotiations with Chile and Singapore, which, when implemented, will open new markets for American exporters while expanding choice and value for American consumers.
By lowering prices through imports and increasing incomes through trade, America's newest trade agreements will build on the success of the North American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA) and the Uruguay Round.
The Bush Administration looks forward to continuing to work with the Congress in 2003 to lay a firm foundation for a more prosperous America by passing the free trade agreements with Chile and Singapore; building upon administration proposals to open markets in global trade talks; advancing negotiations on the Free Trade Area of the Americas (FTAA); negotiating new FTAs with the five countries of the Central American Common Market, Australia, Morocco, and the five countries of the Southern African Customs Union; enforcing U.S. trade laws; and monitoring and pressing China's and Taiwan's compliance with their WTO obligations.
AD3119 -- WHAT DOES INTERNATIONAL LAW SAY ABOUT PRISONERS OF WAR? (Council on Foreign Relations, Updated March 26, 2003, 4 printed pages)
Brief overview of international law regarding prisoners of war, including links to major international conventions.
AD3120 -- Davis, Lynn E. GLOBALIZATION'S SECURITY IMPLICATIONS (RAND, March 2003, 8 pages)
Globalization can promote prosperity, eradicate disease, and advance political freedom.
It can also promote transnational threats, including weapons of mass destruction.
This paper raises the broader issues arising from different aspects of globalization, focusing both on the threats and the opportunities, with the goal of suggesting very briefly a new way of approaching security in the coming decades.
Just as important, the paper tries to make the case that the national security and international economic policymaking communities each has a critical stake in what traditionally have been the responsibilities of the other.
Note: Contains copyrighted material.
AD3121 -- Ottaway, Marina; Yaphe, Judith.
POLITICAL RECONSTRUCTION IN IRAQ: A REALITY CHECK (Carnegie Endowment for International Peace, March 27, 2003, 8 pages)
Plans for the political reconstruction of Iraq are bound to fail if they do not take into consideration that Iraq is not a political blank slate to be transformed at American will into a democratic, secular, pluralist, and federal state.
It is a difficult country with multiple social groups and power centers with conflicting agendas.
The United States must not try to impose a system of its own devising on these groups.
Loose talk about bringing democracy to Iraq confuses what external actors can do and what Iraqis alone can accomplish.
The United States should also not underestimate the extent to which broader U.S. policies toward the Middle East and its handling of Iraq's oil will affect the willingness of parties within and outside Iraq to cooperate in its peaceful reconstruction.
Washington's next steps in the Israeli-Palestinian conflict, in relations with Iran, and in shaping a new regional security system will determine whether the Iraq war is the beginning or the end of regional crisis and bloodshed.
Note: Contains copyrighted material.
AD3122 -- Niksch, Larry A. NORTH KOREA'S NUCLEAR WEAPONS PROGRAM (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, Updated March 17, 2003, 16 pages)
The main elements of Bush Administration policy are (1) terminating the Agreed Framework; (2) no bilateral negotiations with North Korea until it satisfies U.S. concerns over its nuclear program; (3) assembling an its nuclear program; (3) assembling an international coalition to pressure North Korea; and (4) proposing multilateral talks involving North Korea and other countries, possibly under United Nations auspices; (5) warning and planning for future economic sanctions against North Korea; and (6) warning North Korea not to reprocess nuclear weapons-grade plutonium, including asserting that "all options are open," including military options.
China, South Korea, and Russia have criticized the Bush Administration for not negotiating directly with North Korea, and they voice opposition to economic sanctions and to the use of force against Pyongyang.
The Administration has placed emphasis on China as a source of pressure on North Korea.
AD3123 -- Miko, Francis T; Park, Grace.
TRAFFICKING IN WOMEN AND CHILDREN: THE U.S.
AND INTERNATIONAL RESPONSE (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, Updated March 6, 2003, 28 pages)
The trafficking in people for prostitution and forced labor is one of the fastest growing areas of international criminal activity and one that is of increasing concern to the United States and the international community.
The overwhelming majority of those trafficked are women and children.
Between 700,000 and 4 million people are believed to be trafficked each year worldwide; some 50,000 to the United States.
Trafficking is now considered the third largest source of profits for organized crime, behind only drugs and weapons, generating billions of dollars annually.
The Bush administration and Congress have continued to give priority to the trafficking problem.
The State Department issued its second Congressionally mandated report on worldwide trafficking in June 2002.
It categorized countries according to the efforts they were making to combat trafficking.
Those countries that do not cooperate in the fight against trafficking could face U.S. sanctions, starting in 2003.
The Consolidated Appropriations Resolution for FY2003 (H.J.Res.2), signed into law by the President on February 20, 2003 (P.L. 108-7), included at least $32 million for efforts to combat human trafficking and to help victims of trafficking.
AD3124 -- GLOBAL DEVELOPMENT FINANCE 2003: STRIVING FOR STABILITY IN DEVELOPMENT FINANCE (World Bank, Web-posted April 2, 2003, 249 pages)
Since the late 1990s, a fundamental shift has occurred in the pattern of private sector financial flows to developing countries.
Debt flows have fallen sharply, while equity flows - mainly in the form of foreign direct investment - have remained comparatively robust.
This shift from debt to equity should diminish the volatility of developing countries' external finance and improve their access to technology, markets, and management expertise.
But much more needs to be done to put development finance on a stable basis.
The decline in debt flows, coupled with weak export revenues, has placed enormous pressure on the middle-income, highly indebted countries.
Many low-income countries face the triple burden of low commodity prices, unsustainable debt, and declining levels of aid.
Growth remains well short of what is necessary to achieve the Millennium Development Goals.
Global Development Finance 2003, I: Analysis and Statistical Appendix is the World Bank's annual review of recent trends in and prospects for financial flows to developing countries.
It also contains the Bank's projections of the global outlook in light of current global geopolitical uncertainties.
Note: Contains copyrighted material.
AD3125 -- SHAPE THE FUTURE OF LIFE: HEALTHY ENVIRONMENTS FOR CHILDREN (World Health Organization, April 2003, 24 pages)
April 7 is World Health Day; the theme for 2003 is "Healthy Environments for Children".
This publication provides an overview of the environmental problems faced by today's children.
More than 5 million children from 0 to 14 years old die every year from diseases linked to the environments in which they live, learn and play - their home, their school, their community.
Degraded environments are the breeding ground for germs, worms and disease-bearing insects.
Half a billion children worldwide are debilitated by diseases such as malaria, schistosomiasis, dengue fever and cholera.
Many environmental threats to children's health are aggravated by persistent poverty, conflicts, natural and man-made disasters, and social inequity.
The children worst affected are those in the developing world but there are many children in the more developed, even the richest, countries, who are also at risk.
Children have a unique vulnerability.
As they grow and develop, there are "windows of susceptibility": periods when their organs and systems may be particularly sensitive to the effect of certain environmental threats.
AD3126 -- FDI [FOREIGN DIRECT INVESTMENT] IN LEAST DEVELOPED COUNTRIES AT A GLANCE: 2002 (United Nations Conference on Trade and Development, Web-posted March 10, 2003, 136 pages)
The 2002 version of FDI in LDCs at a Glance provides information on the current FDI situation in each of 49 LDCs.
The first part depicts recent trends in FDI to least developed countries and changes that have taken place in relevant areas of the regulatory legal framework.
The second part presents country profiles for each of the 49 least developed countries to enable the reader, at a glance, to get a general picture of the role of FDI in these countries.
Note: The countries covered in this report are: Afghanistan; Angola; Bangladesh; Benin; Bhutan; Burkina Faso; Burundi; Cambodia; Cape Verde; Central African Republic; Chad; Comoros; Djibouti; Democratic Republic of Congo; Equatorial Guinea; Eritrea; Ethiopia; Gambia; Guinea Bissau; Guinea; Haiti; Kiribati; Laos; Lesotho; Liberia; Madagascar; Malawi; Maldives; Mali; Mauritania; Mozambique; Myanmar; Nepal; Niger; Rwanda; Samoa; Sao Tome; Senegal; Sierra Leone; Solomon Islands; Somalia; Sudan; Togo; Tuvalu; Uganda; United Republic of Tanzania; Vanuatu; Yemen; Zambia.
Basic information is provided on the volume and significance of FDI in least developed countries.
The data coverage also includes a breakdown of FDI by source country, industry and mode of entry.
FDI flows are related to domestic investment, and data on the largest foreign affiliates and their operations in least developed countries are presented.
Finally, information is provided on developments in the international legal framework.
AD3127 -- REPAIRING THE RIFT: THE UNITED STATES AND EUROPE AFTER IRAQ (Brookings Institution, April 3, 2003, 20 pages)
This panel discussion was planned partly in connection with Brookings' semi-annual meeting of the U.S.-European Forum which is a joint effort by a number of institutions in both the U.S. and Europe to try to provide an ongoing dialogue between senior U.S. and European officials.
The moderator of the discussion is James B. Steinberg, Vice President and Director, Foreign Policy Studies, Brookings Institution.
The panelists are: Christoph Bertram, Director, German Institute for International and Security Affairs and former Foreign Policy Editor, Die Zeit; Ivo H. Daalder, Senior Fellow, Foreign Policy Studies and the Sydney Stein Jr.
Chair, Brookings Institution; Charles Grant, Director, Centre for European Reform and former Editor and Correspondent, The Economist; Robert Kagan, Senior Associate, Carnegie Endowment for International Peace and author of Paradise and Power.
Note: This is an uncorrected transcript of a panel discussion and has occasional gaps and misplaced words.
AD3128 -- Perl, Raphael.
DRUG CONTROL: INTERNATIONAL POLICY AND APPROACHES (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, Updated March 6, 2003, 19 pages)
Efforts to significantly reduce the flow of illicit drugs from abroad into the United States have so far not succeeded.
Moreover, over the past decade, worldwide production of illicit drugs has risen dramatically: opium and marijuana production has roughly doubled and coca production tripled.
Street prices of cocaine and heroin have fallen significantly in the past 20 years, reflecting increased availability.
The effectiveness of international narcotics control programs in reducing consumption is a matter of ongoing concern.
Drug control approaches addressed in this issue brief include: Expansion of efforts to reduce foreign production at the source; Expansion of interdiction and enforcement activities to disrupt supply lines; Expansion of efforts to reduce worldwide demand; Expansion of economic disincentives for international drug trafficking.
AD3129 -- Stoltzfus, Emilie.
CRITIQUE OF STATE DEPARTMENT'S HUMAN RIGHTS REPORT (Human Rights Watch, April 4, 2003, 3 printed pages)
This brief critique characterizes the most recent country reports: "For the most part, the reports candidly describe human rights abuses committed by U.S. allies in the war on terrorism, including Egypt, Saudi Arabia, Uzbekistan, China and Russia.
One exception is a reference in the reports' introduction to elections in Pakistan producing a 'reasonably representative' government.
In fact, key moderate parties were banned from standing in the elections for parliament last year."
Furthermore, "The Bush administration has not pulled many punches in this report," said Tom Malinowski, Washington advocacy director for Human Rights Watch.
"But it should also be troubled that some of its closest allies in the war on terrorism engage in repressive practices that fuel support for terrorists."
AD3130 -- Katzman, Kenneth.
IRAQ: U.S. REGIME CHANGE EFFORTS AND POST-WAR IRAQ (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, Updated April 7, 2003, 19 pages)
Since February 2003, the Administration has stressed that regime change through U.S.-led military action would yield benefits beyond disarmament, including liberation from an oppressive regime for the Iraqi people and enhancement of the prospects for peace and democracy throughout the Middle East.
The goal of regime change in Iraq has been declared U.S. policy since November 1998.
Even before then, U.S. efforts to oust Saddam had been pursued, with varying degrees of intensity, since the end of the Gulf war in 1991.
These efforts primarily involved U.S. backing for opposition groups inside and outside Iraq, some of which have been receiving U.S. political and financial support and military training.
According to several experts, past efforts to change the regime floundered because of limited U.S. commitment, disorganization of the Iraqi opposition, and the efficiency and ruthlessness of Iraq's several overlapping intelligence and security forces.
Previous U.S. administrations ruled out major U.S. military action to change Iraq's regime, believing such action would be costly, risky, and not necessarily justified by the level of Iraq's lack of compliance on WMD disarmament.
The character of the government that would replace Saddam Hussein's Baath Party, should Operation Iraqi Freedom succeed, is yet to be determined.
Some Administration officials had hoped that major military and governmental defections from the Hussein regime would serve as the core of a successor government.
However, the Hussein regime has generally held together throughout Operation Iraqi Freedom, and the Bush Administration is apparently turning to the exiled opposition groups to form the core of a new regime, although Iraqis currently living within the country are likely to be incorporated into a new government eventually.
It is possible that some of the pre-existing disputes and schisms within the opposition could break out into a post-war power struggle.
AD3131 -- FREQUENTLY ASKED QUESTIONS: SEVERE ACUTE RESPIRATORY SYNDROME (SARS) (Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
Updated April 7, 2003, 8 pages)
This document includes basic information about SARS and its spread, as well as travel and quarantine information.
There are also guidelines for prevention and control in both personal and health care settings.
AD3132 -- Brunson Russell; Conte, Zephryn; Masar, Shelley.
THE ART IN PEACEMAKING: A GUIDE TO INTEGRATING CONFLICT RESOLUTION EDUCATION INTO YOUTH ARTS PROGRAMS (National Endowment for the Arts and the U.S. Department of Justice, Office of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, Web-posted March 2003, 87 pages)
Arts-based education programs are in an excellent position to provide young people with skills that enable them to address conflicts while also encouraging them to express themselves creatively, work with positive role models, and discuss their experiences through the arts.
Community arts programs can build on this foundation and help young people manage their disputes by incorporating conflict resolution education into their programming.
Conflict resolution helps create a safe environment in which to learn, and provides youth and arts teachers with life skills that can be used in all facets of their lives.
An Initiative of the Partnership for Conflict Resolution in the Arts, this guide was created to give arts teachers working in after-school programs a set of tools to help youth from the age of eight to eighteen manage disputes they face on a daily basis.
AD3133 -- Prados, Alfred B. SYRIA: U.S. RELATIONS AND BILATERAL ISSUES (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, Updated April 11, 2003, 19 pages)
An array of bilateral issues continue to affect relations between the United States and Syria: the course of Arab-Israeli talks; questions of arms proliferation; Syrian connections with terrorist activity and previous involvement in narcotics traffic; Syria's human rights record; Syria's role in Lebanon; and a warming trend in Syrian relations with Iraq.
A variety of U.S. legislative provisions and executive directives prohibit direct aid to Syria and restrict bilateral trade relations between the two countries.
Syria has reportedly cooperated with the United States in investigating Osama bin Laden's Al Qaeda organization in the aftermath of the September 11 attacks but has been unwilling to sever connections with some other terrorist organizations.
On April 10, 2003, Representatives Ileana Ros-Lehtinen and Eliot Engel introduced the Syria Accountability and Lebanese Sovereignty Restoration Act of 2003.
According to a statement by Representative Engel's office, this bill "holds Syria accountable for its support for terrorism, occupation of Lebanon, and possession and continued development of weapons of mass destruction."
AD3134 -- WORLD ECONOMIC OUTLOOK: GROWTH AND INSTITUTIONS (International Monetary Fund, April 2003, 7 printed pages)
For the past three months, concerns over conflict in the Middle East have weighed heavily on the global economy, through oil prices, through confidence effects and through financial markets.
As near-term uncertainties over the conflict recede, the question of the hour is whether present sputtering global growth will suddenly lunge ahead into an immediate strong recovery.
Perhaps, but our baseline here is for subnormal growth of 3.2 percent (1.1 trillion dollars) in 2003, rising to 4.1 percent in 2004.
This baseline assumes a tepid global recovery with normal growth only resuming sometime during the first half of 2004.
Across the major regions, the United States, which accounts for just over 1/5 of global GDP, is projected to have 2.2 percent growth in 2003 -- not yet enough to make a meaningful dent in unemployment -- and 3.6 percent growth in 2004.
Growth in the euro area (roughly 1/6th of global GDP) is again lackluster at 1.1 percent in 2003 and 2.3 percent in 2004.
Japan remains mired in a slump at 0.8 percent growth for 2003 and 1.0 percent for 2004.
Emerging Asia is in fact the strongest growing region of the world at 6.0 percent for 2003 and 6.3 percent for 2004, though we do not view this recovery as self-sustaining if the rest of the world slumps.
Moreover, the effects of the incipient SARS epidemic are likely to have an adverse impact (of perhaps about 0.4 percent if the epidemic lasts for one quarter).
Note: Contains copyrighted material.
AD3135 -- Andrew Rathmell; Theodore Karasik; David Gompert.
A NEW PERSIAN GULF SECURITY SYSTEM (RAND, Web-posted April 10, 2003, 12 pages)
The authors examine the options for a post-Saddam Persian Gulf security system.
A fundamentally new Iraqi regime is necessary but, the authors argue, insufficient for lasting Gulf security.
The authors analyze the strategic challenges of Gulf security and outline the disadvantages to the United States and to the region of today's heavy dependence on a forward U.S. military presence and readiness to fight increasingly risky expeditionary wars.
They argue that two alternative models for the Gulf, a unilateral U.S. attempt to impose liberal democracy or a return to an old-fashioned balance-of-power approach, will not work.
Instead, they suggest that a multilateral U.S.-European effort to build a more robust intra-regional balance of power, underpinned by broad political reform around the Gulf, could lay the basis for long-term stability.
Note: Contains copyrighted material.
AD3136 -- IRAQ: RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE OCCUPYING POWERS (Amnesty International, April 16, 2003, 11 printed pages)
International law on belligerent occupation does not address the question of the legality of occupation.
Its rules apply to any occupying power for the sole fact that it is in control of a foreign territory, whatever the reason for this situation.
Recognizing the applicability of such a law to a given situation does not constitute a judgment on the legal status of the territory concerned.
The provisions of the law on belligerent occupation are found in international humanitarian law, also known as the laws of war or the laws on armed conflict.
As such, they take into account the military and security concerns of the occupying power, balancing them against the rights of those who find themselves under its authority.
AD3137 -- Cordesman, Anthony H. THE "INSTANT LESSONS" OF THE IRAQ WAR.
MAIN REPORT, THIRD WORKING DRAFT (Center for Strategic and International Studies, April 14, 2003, 95 pages)
After a review of what are still unknown factors in the war in Iraq, the author assesses the strengths of specific coalition assets that have provided them a formidable advantage.
Among the coalition strengths, Cordesman notes: competence and flexibility in war planning; the value of training and readiness; intelligence assets; coordination of air, ground and naval operations.
AD3138 -- A GUIDE TO WORLD RESOURCES 2002-2004: DECISIONS FOR THE EARTH: BALANCE, VOICE, AND POWER (United Nations Development Programme, United Nations Environment Programme, World Bank, World Resources Institute, 2003, 36 pages)
One goal of this report is to advance the thesis that attention to better environmental governance is one of the most direct routes to reversing the world's environmental decline.
In practice, better governance must translate to more inclusive processes for making decisions about natural resources.
Institutions must clearly integrate environmental concerns into everyday activities and economic decisions.
Natural resource management agencies like forestry, agriculture, mining, and environment ministries need to reshape their mission and structure around maintaining the health of ecosystems.
This edition focuses on the importance of good environmental governance by exploring how citizens, government managers, and business owners can foster better environmental decisions that meet the needs of people and ecosystems with equity and balance.
[wwwgtop.gif]
April 2003 AD3089 -- Gordon, Philip H. THE CRISIS IN THE ALLIANCE (Brookings Institution, February 24, 2003, 6 pages)
The current Europe-U.S. dispute arises from the interpretation of United Nations and NATO commitments with regard to Iraq.
For the United States, the essence of Resolution 1441 was voluntary Iraqi disarmament-if Iraq failed to demonstrate that it was free of weapons of mass destruction, the threat of "serious consequences" meant the use of military force.
Many Europeans, on the other hand-including at least the French, German, and Belgian governments?instead put the emphasis on weapons inspections.
While accepting that Iraq has failed to fully account for its past programs, they argue that this need not yet be considered a casus belli, that 1441 contains no timetable for action, and that more intrusive inspections, so long as they can be maintained, remain a better approach than war.
These European governments seem to be making the case for an enhanced form of containment, even though the approach they accepted in 1441 appeared to be a choice between genuine disarmament and war.
If these were just the views of a small number of European governments-even including veto-wielding France and current Security Council president Germany-it would not pose the Bush Administration much of a problem.
France and Germany would be isolated and the United States could move ahead to implement 1441 according to its own interpretation.
The problem, however, is that a vast majority of European public opinion?around 82 percent according to recent polls?along with key foreign governments like Russia and China, shares the French and German perspective.
Note: Contains copyrighted material.
AD3090 -- Morrison, Wayne M. CHINA'S ECONOMIC CONDITIONS (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, Updated February 20, 2003, 17 pages)
On January 9, 2003, the United Nations reported that in 2002, China had replaced the United States as the world's largest recipient of foreign direct investment.
Since the initiation of economic reforms in 1979, China has become one of the world's fastest growing economies.
From 1979-2002, China's real GDP rose at an average annual rate of 9.3%; it rose by an estimated 8.0% in 2002.
Many economists speculate that China could become the world's largest economy at some point in the near future, provided that the government is able to continue and deepen economic reforms, particularly in regards to its efficient state-owned enterprises (SOEs) and state banking system.
Progress in reforming these sectors in recent years has been somewhat mixed.
Painful economic reforms will be necessary to keep the economy strong in 2003 and beyond.
AD3091 -- NATIONAL STRATEGY TO SECURE CYBERSPACE (Executive Office of the President, February 2003, 76 pages)
This report is an implementing component of the National Strategy for Homeland Security and is complemented by the National Strategy for the Physical Protection of Critical Infrastructures and Key Assets.
The purpose of this document is to engage and empower Americans to secure the portions of cyberspace that they own, operate, control, or with which they interact.
Securing cyberspace is a difficult strategic challenge that requires coordinated and focused effort from the entire society?the federal government, state and local governments, the private sector, and the American people.
Consistent with the National Strategy for Homeland Security, [Note: Published in July 2002, available at: http://www.dhs.gov/interweb/assetlibrary/nat_strat_hls.pdf ] the strategic objectives of this National Strategy to Secure Cyberspace are to: prevent cyber attacks against America's critical infrastructures; reduce national vulnerability to cyber attacks; and minimize damage and recovery time from cyber attacks that do occur.
AD3092 -- NATIONAL STRATEGY FOR PHYSICAL PROTECTION OF CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURES AND KEY ASSETS (Executive Office of the President, February 2003, 96 pages)
This report is an implementing component of the National Strategy for Homeland Security [Note: Published in July 2002, available at: http://www.dhs.gov/interweb/assetlibrary/nat_strat_hls.pdf and is complemented by the National Strategy to Secure Cyberspace.
The strategic objectives that underpin the national infrastructure and key asset protection effort include: Identifying and assuring the protection of those infrastructure and assets we deem most critical; Providing timely warning and assuring the protection of those infrastructures and assets that face a specific, imminent threat; and Assuring the protection of other infrastructures and assets that may become targets over time by pursuing specific initiatives and enabling a collaborative environment between the public and private sector.
AD3093 -- Rice, Susan E. THE NEW NATIONAL SECURITY STRATEGY: FOCUS ON FAILED STATES (Brookings Institution Policy Brief, February 2003, 9 printed pages)
Among the most important elements of President Bush's first National Security Strategy (NSS) is its focus on failed states.
The president is wise to draw attention to the significant threats to our national security posed by failed and failing states.
Such states can and often do serve as safe havens and staging grounds for terrorist organizations.
Failed states create environments that spur wider regional conflicts with significant economic and security costs to neighboring states.
They pose serious challenges to U.S. interests in terms of refugee flows, trafficking in illicit goods, peacekeeping and humanitarian assistance, and lost trade and investment opportunities.
Despite the welcome emphasis in the NSS on the security threats posed by failing states, the Strategy does not offer any vision, policies, or new resources to counter these threats.
A new U.S. strategy should combine improved intelligence collection with more aggressive efforts at conflict resolution and post-conflict "nation-building" in global crisis zones.
Creating pockets of improved development and security would help limit the operating space of international outlaws.
Thus, the United States should devise innovative ways to assist failed and failing states through targeted development and counterterrorism assistance as well as improved trade access to the U.S. market.
Note: Contains copyrighted material.
AD3094 -- SMITH ET AL. V. DOE ET AL. SEX OFFENDER INFORMATION ON THE INTERNET (Supreme Court of the United States, Decided March 5, 2003, 38 pages)
Under the Alaska Sex Offender Registration Act (Act), any sex offender or child kidnaper incarcerated in the State must register with the Department of Corrections within 30 days before his release, providing his name, address, and other specified information.
The offender's information is forwarded to the Department of Public Safety, which maintains a central registry of sex offenders.
Some of the data, such as fingerprints, driver's license number, anticipated change of address, and whether the offender has had medical treatment afterwards is kept confidential.
The offender's name, aliases, address, photograph, physical description, driver's license number, motor vehicle identification numbers, place of employment, date of birth, crime, date and place of conviction, length and conditions of sentence, and a statement as to whether the offender is in compliance with the Act's update requirements or cannot be located are published on the Internet.
Supporters of this practice, also common in other states, argue that parents have a right to know if convicted sex offenders are living in their area; opponents argue that posting some of the information, including photographs, on the Internet, violates the rights to privacy of convicts who have served their prison sentences and presumably have paid their debts to society.
The Court decided, in a 7-2 decision, that the web-posting of information under the Alaska Sex Offender Registration Act, is not punitive, and that the practice may continue.
AD3095 -- LIVING WELL WITH HIV/AIDS: A MANUAL ON NUTRITIONAL CARE AND SUPPORT FOR PEOPLE LIVING WITH HIV/AIDS (Food and Agriculture Organization of the United Nations and the World Health Organization, February 2003, 50 printed pages)
The FAO/WHO manual offers households caring for a family member with AIDS inexpensive, locally available remedies for the symptoms linked to the disease.
Herbs and spices can stimulate a sluggish appetite or digestion and may have other beneficial effects.
Cinnamon can be brewed into a tea to calm chesty coughs, for example, and mint leaves can be used as a gargle.
By encouraging good nutritional habits FAO and WHO hope the manual will improve the diet, health and resistance to infection of the entire family.
Designed to be used by caregivers, health-workers, community groups and non-governmental organizations, the manual includes: * forms to monitor weight loss and food intake; * fact-sheets outlining the principles of a healthy diet; * tips on how to ensure good hygiene when preparing food; * recipes with immune system-boosting micronutrients like vitamins and minerals.
It focuses on ways of easing the symptoms of HIV/AIDS - lack of appetite, tiredness, soreness of mouth - by suggesting recipes for soups, teas and stews using fruit and vegetables - guava, papaya and baobab for example - that grow in the rural areas of the developing world hardest hit by the AIDS epidemic.
AD3096 -- Hulsman, John C. NATIONAL DRUG CONTROL STRATEGY (Executive Office of the President, February 2003, 59 pages)
The new White House Drug Control Strategy proposes a fiscal year 2004 budget of $11.7 billion for drug control serving three core priorities: stopping drug use before it starts; healing America's drug users; and disrupting the market.
The 2003 strategy reports progress toward meeting the President's goals of reducing drug use by 10 percent over two years, and 25 percent over five years, highlighted by reductions in drug use among young people for the first time in nearly a decade.
The 2003 strategy also highlights a new treatment initiative funded with $600 million over three years to help addicted Americans find needed treatment and support services from the most effective programs, including faith-based and community-based organizations.
AD3097 -- Byman, Daniel L. TERRORISM AND THE WAR WITH IRAQ (Brookings Institution, March 3, 2003, 7 printed pages)
The impending war with Iraq greatly raises the risk of a terrorist attack against the U.S. homeland, American interests overseas, or U.S. allies.
When Saddam Husayn sees war as unavoidable, he may shed his recently acquired caution in using terrorism, either employing Iraq's own operatives more aggressively or working with al-Qa'eda against Western targets.
Al-Qa'eda and its affiliates, on their own, will seek to strike at this time of maximum public attention.
Small cells of unknown Islamist radicals, or perhaps even angry individuals inspired by al-Qa'eda, may also see the outbreak of war as a reason to strike.
Al-Qa'eda and like-minded groups probably will try to take advantage of the expected rage in the Islamic world at the U.S.-led campaign to bolster their recruitment and fundraising?potentially making them more potent in the future.
The issues of Iraq and the war on terrorism will remain linked even after any war ends.
The extent of the reconstruction effort and the nature of the post-Saddam government could shape the prospects for terrorism in the Middle East for years to come.
Note: Contains copyrighted material.
AD3098 -- Logan, John R. and Deane, Glenn.
BLACK DIVERSITY IN METROPOLITAN AMERICA (Lewis Mumford Center for Comparative Urban and Regional Research, State University of New York at Albany, February 17, 2003, 13 pages)
Note: Statistical tables by metropolitan area are available at: http://mumford1.dyndns.org/cen2000/BlackWhite/BlackWhite.htm
http://mumford1.dyndns.org/cen2000/BlackWhite/BlackDiversityReport/Blac k_Diversity_final.pdf
This report compares data from both the 1990 and the 2000 U.S. population censuses.
The number of black Americans with recent roots in sub-Saharan Africa more than doubled during the 1990's.
The number with origins in the Caribbean increased by over 60 percent.
Census 2000 shows that Afro-Caribbeans in the United States number over 1.5 million, larger than some more visible national-origin groups such as Cubans and Koreans.
Africans number over half a million.
In some major metropolitan regions, these "new" black groups amount to 20% or more of the black population.
And nationally nearly 25% of the growth of the black population between 1990 and 2000 was due to people from Africa and the Caribbean.
In the metropolitan areas where they live in largest numbers, Africans tend to live in neighborhoods with higher median income and education level than African Americans and Afro-Caribbeans.
In these metro areas Afro-Caribbeans tend to live in neighborhoods with a higher percent homeowners than either African Americans or Africans.
Note: Contains copyrighted material.
AD3099 -- McKibbin, Warwick J. and Stoecke, Andrew l.
THE ECONOMIC COSTS OF A WAR IN IRAQ (Brookings Institution, March 7, 2003, 8 pages)
Estimating the costs of a war with Iraq is difficult.
The uncertainties are enormous.
Federal Reserve Chairman Alan Greenspan was questioned at a congressional hearing on the US$100 billion a year cost of United States troops being in Iraq.
He responded that he was 'doubtful if the impact on the economy is more than modest, largely because this is not Vietnam or Korea'.
Others disagree.
William Nordhaus, for example, believes these estimated economic costs of a war with Iraq are too low based on a history of underestimation of the cost of wars and based on the experience of the 1991 Gulf War.
In making an estimate of the economic costs of a war it is important to distinguish between the cost to government budgets, versus the overall economic cost to the world economy.
In this paper the authors attempt to calculate the global economic costs, taking account of a range of factors that affect the overall costs of war in Iraq.
War with Iraq is likely to be costly to the world economy in the short term.
How costly depends on the length of the war and the compounding effects of many different factors.
AD3100 -- Woolf, Amy F. NUCLEAR ARMS CONTROL: THE STRATEGIC OFFENSIVE REDUCTIONS TREATY (Library of Congress, Congressional Research Service, Updated March 3, 2003, 25 pages)
On March 6, 2003, the U.S. Senate unanimously approved the Strategic Offensive Reductions Treaty, also known as the "Moscow Treaty", which will reduce the total number of U.S. and Russian long-range nuclear warheads by two-thirds by the year 2012.
The Russian Duma and Federation Council are also expected to ratify this treaty, which was signed by Presidents Bush and Putin in May 2002.
In it, the two nations state that they will reduce strategic nuclear weapons to between 1,700 and 2,200 warheads by December 31, 2012.
Press reports and public statements have hailed this agreement as a sharp reduction from current levels of around 6,000 warheads.
However, this new treaty differs from past arms control treaties in that it does not include any of the detailed definitions, counting rules, elimination procedures, or monitoring and verification provisions that have become common in treaties signed since the late 1980s.
Consequently, a simple comparison of warhead levels counted under START I and warhead levels permitted by the new Treaty does not provide a complete view of the likely effects of the new Treaty.
This report provides a brief overview of the two nations' objectives when they began discussions on this treaty and a summary of how they resolved these differences when concluding the negotiations.
It then describes the key provisions in the Treaty and presents illustrative forces that each side might deploy in the next 10 years.
It offers a brief assessment of how each nation fared in achieving its objectives when negotiating this agreement and a summary of reaction from U.S. and Russian commentators.
Th
